_	In support of the first two, the Baraita cited God's injunction in "Only be strong and very courageous to observe to do according to all the law that My servant Moses enjoined upon you."
_	As senator, Frosh worked to draft the law that provides a waiver of tuition and fees to state universities for children in foster care.
_	After Weber, G.T. Fechner expanded upon the knowledge he gleaned from Herbart and Weber, to devise the law that the strength of a sensation grows as the logarithm of the stimulus intensity.
_	During his first year in office, Buckley posed as an inmate for two days in an out-of-state prison, eliminated censorship of inmate mail, allowed inmates to use the sheriff's house on the grounds of the Middlesex House of Correction for conjugal visits, and sued his own office to eliminate the law that allowed juveniles to be jailed with adult criminals.
_	With the Supreme Court nullifying the law that created the province still not yet final, elections proceeded to elect the province's representative.
_	Recovery plans became more specific after 1988 when Congress added provisions to Section 4(f) of the law that spelled out the minimum contents of a recovery plan.
_	The Argentine Penal Code is the law that governs crimes and its sanction in the Argentine Republic.
_	Categorizing the law that prohibited Alger from building his wharf as a regulation allowed Shaw to deny Alger's claim for compensation.
_	Specifically, it comments on proposed changes to the law that will weaken, or strengthen, environmental protection; stories and situations where existing environmental laws are failing to protect the environment; and emerging legal strategies that could be used to protect the environment.
_	In 2004, Russia repealed the law that kept PGM production data secret and, in 2005, repealed the law that kept PGM reserve data secret.
_	James expressed his belief in Piper by saying, "If you wish to upset the law that all crows are black, it is enough if you prove that one crow is white.
_	There's nothing in the law that requires cities to stop people without cause, or encourages racial or ethnic profiling by itself."
_	The Israeli Embassy in Norway, which handles diplomatic relations with Iceland, expressed regret over the incident and restated the law that Israeli citizens must carry Israeli passports when in the country.
_	An attorney may seek changes or exemptions in the law that governs the land where the building will be built, either by arguing that a rule is inapplicable (the bridge design will not cause a collapse), or that the custom is no longer needed (acceptance of live-work spaces has grown in the community).
_	The present Brazilian system is organized according to the law that establishes the guidelines and bases for national education - Law n. 9.394 of December 20, 1996.
_	Guinta says he would vote to repeal the Affordable Care Act, though he supports the provisions of the law that protect people with pre-existing conditions and that allow people to stay on their parents' health plans until age 26.
_	And since Doyle had filed his suit under the section of the law that creates federal-question jurisdiction, limitations such as the amount in controversy did not apply.
_	Homer parodies the scene in the 1939 film "The Wizard of Oz" when the Scarecrow demonstrates his newly acquired intelligence by (incorrectly) reciting the law that governs the lengths of the sides of an isosceles triangle.
_	Its Concepción campus was declared a National Heritage in 2016 by the Council of National Monuments of Chile; what makes it the 1st and only University in Chile to have this recognition due to the design and architectural style of its environment that has been implemented in its buildings and campus-level environment since its foundation; the proclamation grants the university special protection and conservation of the campus and its space by the state; therefore, any intervention to the same has to be reported to the Council of Monuments, while any damage and type of vandalism that jeopardizes the integrity and security of the campus will be seriously penalized according to the law that regulates and covers the National Monuments, as well as the prompt construction of the 1st and only Bío Bío Technological Science Park (PACYT) in all of Chile located in the Bío-Bío Region, near the campus of the Universidad de Concepción; which at the same time will be in charge of the administration, organization, and projection of new ideas with a view to the future of it together with the Government of Chile; this initiative is going to be projected as a productive space of the future and a relevant pole of the development of the country, the place where all the creative potential will be housed, knowledge and innovations of high impact will be generated.
_	In the original court case, the judge upheld the law that ISPs whose customers on their homepages link to copyright infringement are as liable as if the customers infringed on that copyright themselves.
_	Despite this, section 38 of the Police Reform Act 2002 (the law that made PCSOs) requires that chief constables or commissioners to ensure a recruit "Has received adequate training in the carrying out of those functions and in the exercise and performance of the powers and duties to be conferred on him by virtue of their designation".
_	This section is for concerns regarding the law that were discussed prior to its passage, but that were excluded from the final bill or were otherwise confirmed would not occur.
_	The United Kingdom has a parental responsibility concept in the law that requires parents to meet the needs of children, such as a right to a home and a right to be maintained.
_	It added an article 5(4) to the law that defined that a foreign work was eligible to copyright in Russia if its copyright had not expired in the source country and it had not fallen into the public domain in Russia through the expiry of its copyright term.
_	It added an article 5(4) to the law that defined that a foreign work was eligible to copyright in Russia if its copyright had not expired in the source country and it had not fallen into the public domain in Russia through the expiry of its copyright term.
_	The motion apologised to all men convicted under the law that criminalised same-sex acts.
_	Republic Act 8047 repealed Executive Order 492, series of 1991, as amended, the law that created the Instructional Materials Development Center under the Department of Education, Culture and Sports (DECS).
_	This decision was reversed by the Supreme Court of Puerto Rico on January 23, 2012, although the lawsuit has turned mainly academic since passage of the law that designates all of the Corridor as a Nature Reserve.
_	Reference 49 U.S. Code 5320 is the law that created program.
_	The law in Hong Kong regarding comparative advertising is the law that existed in the UK prior to the enactment of the UK Act 1994.
_	The E-Verify portion of the law does not apply to all businesses, but those businesses that do use E-Verify are provided an affirmative defense that the business has not violated the provisions of the law that prohibit the employment of illegal immigrant.
_	The NYSSA favored the parts of the law that enhanced sentences for violent offenses committed with a gun, expanded background checks, and mandated safe storage of guns in households that included a member ineligible to legally use guns.
_	The NYSSA opposed the parts of the law that expanded the definition of assault weapons, limited magazine usage, and limited ammunition sales via the Internet.
_	The UFC worked tirelessly to surpass the law that forbade professional mixed martial arts events in the state, including a drastic measure: they announced an event (UFC 197) for the Madison Square Garden, despite the ban still being in effect.
_	In 1964, she wrote the Republic Act No. 4165, or the law that mandated the creation and appropriation of the National Commission for Culture and the Arts.
_	The emergence and observation of a new, lower-priced microcomputer class based on the microprocessor stimulated the creation of the law that Bell described in articles and Bell's books.
_	International humanitarian law (IHL) is the law that regulates the conduct of war ("jus in bello").
_	Johnson gained some recognition in the media and general public during the 2003 California recall election because he was the most important person behind the introduction of the law that allowed state officials to be recalled.
_	Completeness suggests that there are no scenarios covered by the law that cannot be implemented in the enterprise.
_	Not only was the Contract Labor Law largely a response to Chinese “coolie” labor but it explicitly had exemptions written into the law that demonstrated occupational preference.
_	In a letter to the editor of "The New York Times" following Friendly's obituary, 2nd Circuit Judge Jon O. Newman called Friendly "quite simply the pre-eminent appellate judge of his era" who "authored the definitive opinions for the nation in each area of the law that he had occasion to consider."
_	It is worth noting however that following March 2013, lab notebooks are of limited legal use in the United States, due to a change in the law that grants patents to the first person to file, rather than the first person to invent.
_	The version of the Act in force at the time of the illicit conveyance determines the law that applies.
_	Johnson’s work led to a revision the law that changed the relationship between state troopers and civilian leadership.
_	This is does not include observance of ancient Israelite civil laws, the necessity for physical circumcision, and parts of the law that have to do with approach to God, i.e., sacrificial, temple, and priesthood laws which are believed to have been brought to fulfillment in Jesus Christ.
_	Morris was PPS to Esther McVey but resigned his position in January 2015 in order to vote for a change in the law that would require planning permission to demolish or change the use of local pubs.
_	In 2015, FACE criticized Senator Kirsten Gillibrand for inviting Emma Sulkowicz to the State of the Union Address, saying such an honor was "undeserved and violates the principles of confidentiality and gender equality of Title IX, the law that oversees sexual misconduct on campus" and saying that "Sulkowicz failed to establish any wrongdoing by the student she accused after a tribunal, and an appeal at Columbia, as well as an investigation by the New York Police Department."
_	Explaining the origins of the law that one can see in the Cities of Refuge, Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. wrote that early forms of legal procedure were grounded in vengeance.
_	Finally, on June 14, 1971, the Senate of Puerto Rico and Governor Don Luis A. Ferré approved the law that officially created the municipality of Florida.
_	While the previously prevailing opinion held that judges were free to interpret "sharia", the law that even the ruler was subject to, Ebussuud instituted a framework in which the judicial power was derived from the Sultan's and which compelled judges to follow the Sultan's "qānūn-nāmes", "law-letters", in their application of the law.
_	In the village of Haritu in the province of Turku, she was forcibly drafted to the army in accordance with the law that all male vagrants could be forced to serve in the army.
_	However, Ellen's White's statements clearly indicate that the only aspects of the law that were nailed to the cross were those things that specifically pointed forward to his sacrifice (e.g., animal sacrifices).
_	Recent years have also included nominations for a "Listener's Law" (which an MP agreed to sponsor as a parliamentary bill, although he did not support the winning nomination, which he thought was not appropriate), and, in 2006, nominations were sought for the law that listeners would most like to see repealed.
_	By the time the Rekord E2 appeared in 1982 West Germany had already passed the law that would effectively enforce the use of catalytic converters for cars sold there, though at this stage the industry was still being given time, in West Germany, to prepare for the new laws to come into force:
_	These objectives were clearly defined in the opening paragraphs of Decree-Law No. 26539 ("Decreto-Lei n.º 26 539"), the law that was enacted to build the Tarrafal Prison.
_	Rabbi Jose the Galilean taught that the "certain men who were unclean by the dead body of a man, so that they could not keep the Passover on that day" in were those who bore Joseph's coffin, as implied in and The Gemara cited their doing so to support the law that one who is engaged on one religious duty is free from any other.
_	That same year, the governor of the district of Bohol, Joaquin Bengoechia, enacted the law that finalized the boundaries and appointed its first mayor, Simeon Villas.
_	The 1906 legal code did not bring forward the law that created an official state flag and a coat of arms.
_	Acting on his conscience and on the overwhelming sentiment of his constituents, Liongson opposed his own majority party's sponsored bill and gained the public's admiration when he openly declared that he would prefer death to the passage of the law that would destroy the base of the Filipino family.
_	He leveled implicit criticism at the Herzog board for imposing an interpretation on the law that favored unions.
_	Following a change in the law that had been voted through in February 1990, voters had no longer been restricted to a single party list, and Christa Schmidt's name had been on the CDU party list for the Leipzig electoral district, positioned high enough up on the list for her now to be elected to the assembly.
_	I of Poland abolishes the law that required Jews to wear special clothes.
_	On 25 February 1965 she introduced the law that made "the uniform socialist education system" standard in all schools, colleges and universities throughout East Germany.
_	In enacting this article the Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of the law that actions of state agencies be taken openly and that their deliberation be conducted openly.
_	A part-time law student, Falco tends to know more about the "fine print" of the law that could sink otherwise good-faith arrests.
_	Among the critics of the views put forward in this book was a Jesuit, Francis Line (1595–1675), and it was while answering his objections that Boyle made his first mention of the law that the volume of a gas varies inversely to the pressure of the gas, which among English-speaking people is usually called Boyle's Law after his name.
_	Merely by speaking well and covering all the intricacies of the case he brought, he upholds the law that the Court ought to be available to remind themselves that there is a forum when alternatives to the Court has failed, which is how meaningful cases can come to Court.
_	Incorporated into the "Forum Iudicum" formulated by Chindasuinth, published by Recceswinth, and modified by Erwig was the law that any oath rendered unto anybody other than the monarch was invalid and illegal.
_	The "vast majority" of cases that come within this grant of jurisdiction are covered by Justice Holmes' statement that a "`suit arises under the law that creates the cause of action.'"
_	The goal of this ordinance is to reduce evictions by fixing loopholes and gaps in the law that were exploited by landlords to expel tenants.
_	Two lawsuits were filed to the domestic partnership law and on 6 June 2018 the Supreme Court revoked the parts of the law that banned same-sex marriages.
_	Judge Nazih Tangho of the High Administrative Court referred the case to the Constitutional Court to look into the law that gave the constitutional panel legal immunity, a clause he said needed vetting because no one should be above legal supervision.
_	Muslim Brotherhood lawyer Abdel Moneim Abdel Maqsoud stated that the Supreme Constitutional Court needed at least two months to rule on the case, citing the law that obliged it to consider the cases 45 days after its referral.
_	For example, the law that established EYDAP committed the state to subsidise 60% of its capital expenditure either through EU funds or Greek funds.
_	In Cebu City, city moralist Rene Josef Bullecer said that the law that created the MTRCB does not allow the showing of the movie.
_	When the government was planning a governing organisation for doctors in 1847, Bernard lobbied to have dentistry included in the law that would establish the College of Physicians and Surgeons of Lower Canada.
_	It certainly cannot be the law that each juror should not listen with deference to the arguments, and with a distrust of his own judgment, if he finds a large majority of the jury taking a different view of the case from what he does himself.
_	In the USA, it is required by the law that any producer wanting to label and sell a product as "organic" must meet the standards established by the Organic Food Production Act of 1990, enforced by The State organic program (SOP)
_	The Civil Code of Spain (), formally the Royal Decree of 24 July 1889 () is the law that regulates the major aspects of Spanish civil law.
_	This decision was confirmed in the third AVNOJ assembly in August 10, 1945, and the law that regulated the autonomous status of Vojvodina within Serbia was adopted in September 1, 1945.
_	Laroche's defense was a loophole in the law that he claimed allowed the Seminole natives to remove endangered species from the swamp.
_	The influence is visible even in the law of persons or of the family, which is traditionally the part of the law that changes least.
_	Shortly after Congress approved the Troubled Asset Relief Program, Foxx identified a provision in the law that allowed her to force consideration of a measure to deny the second, $350 billion, tranche of the TARP bailout.
_	In particular, Kobach references the phrase in the law that directly states that officers "may not solely consider race, color, or national origin."
_	By that time, Schenck had enjoyed a long cooperative association with Moore who had refused to relocate a granite monument to the historic basis of the law that included the Ten Commandments.
_	He was among those who rallied in support of Featherston's continued presidency in 1939 (supporting the overturning of the law that limited a Confederate President to one six-year term), and enrolled his sons in the Hitler Youth-like Freedom Youth Corps; when the war began, they would go into the CS Army.
_	But also let them know that the attorneys took four other women to the Supreme Court to challenge the law that led to the end of segregation."
_	The shortcomings include "a limit to the number of broadcast channels; a lack of clear rules for the licensing of satellite, mobile telephone and online broadcasting; the placement of all forms of broadcasting under a regime of licensing or permission by the Regulator; the granting of authority to the courts to terminate broadcast licences based on provisions in the law that contain undue limitations on freedom of the media; and a lack of procedures and terms for the establishment of private digital channels."
_	Applying this principle to the art of poetry, and analysing, line by line and even word by word, the works of great poets, he deduced the law that the beauty of poetry consists in the accuracy, beauty and harmony of individual expression.
_	Generally speaking the appellate court examines the record of evidence presented in the trial court and the law that the lower court applied and decides whether that decision was legally sound or not.
_	Even though SR 125 was established in 1964, no signs went up until the law that made SR 125 was approved by the Washington State Legislature in 1970.
_	Family law (also called matrimonial law or the "law of domestic relations") is an area of the law that deals with family matters and domestic relations.
_	On 23 February 1983, the Government passed a law nationalising Rumasa, a private business that included merchant banking interests, on the grounds that it was at the point of bankruptcy and the government needed to protect the savings of depositors and the jobs of its 60,000 employees, a decision that aroused considerable criticism and a judicial conflict over the law that was only resolved, in favour of the government, in December 1986.
_	While Minister in 1933 he and his successors, his brother Domingo Barnés and then José Pareja Yébenes, were responsible for formulating the law that excluded religious organizations from teaching, and created secular public schools to replace the religious schools.
_	In 1958, the law that is enforced today by the USDA Food Safety and Inspection Service (FSIS) was passed as the Humane Slaughter Act of 1978.
_	However, ācāra was the law that was conveyed in actual practice.
_	Violating the law that safeguards the Maitum jars will lead to imprisonment of up to 20 years and payment for damages up to 250,000 pesos.
_	In the same vein, on 28 May 1897, he pushed for the voting of the law that put an end to secret investigations in the absence of a lawyer, and fought for the institution of a system of competing experts in criminal matters, comparable to the adversarial system.
_	Some scholars believe that the term, when used in the context of the ecclesiastical courts of England in the fourteenth and fifteenth century, also "meant the law that is common to the universal church, as opposed to the constitutions or special customs or privileges of any provincial church."
_	Section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code ( or simply IRC §1), titled "Tax Imposed" is the law that imposes a federal income tax on taxable income, and sets forth the amount of the tax to be paid.
_	Bokova was a member of the Bulgarian communist party until 1990, when the party was renamed in Bulgarian Socialist Party, and her membership was cancelled, after changes in the law that year required that employees of several ministries, among them Foreign Affairs, should not be members of any political party.
_	He was also the author of the urban forestry act and the law that became a health public priority the otoacoustic emission test for babies.
_	Alonso, the Spanish conquistador, rescues Cora, an Inca maiden, when the Temple of the Sun is destroyed by a volcanic eruption, but thereby unwittingly breaks the law that forbids her to leave the temple, on pain of being sacrificed to the gods.
_	In 1935, he reluctantly signed the law that forbade Freemasonary in Portugal, due to his Freemason past.
_	Depending on what the law that is related to a sector states, concession can either allow the authority to retain or keep ownership of the assets, turning over to the concessionaire and reverting the ownership back to an authority once the duration of their concession ended, or both the authority and concessionaire own the facilities.
_	The resourceful Nickerson found a loophole in the law that would solve his problem.
_	Part of the Quran includes understanding and respecting the law that any animal products should not be eaten if the animal has not been slaughtered properly, making the animal or animal-product "maytah".
_	The parashah (in ) reports that "Moses commanded us a law" (, "Torah tzivah-lanu Mosheh"), and in the haftarah (in ), God told Joshua to observe "the law that Moses . . . commanded you" (, "Torah asher tzivcha Mosheh").
_	Nevertheless, CRASH's approach appeared successful and remained in widespread use until the Rampart Division scandal of 1999 drew attention to abuses of the law that threatened to undo hundreds of criminal convictions.
_	Unitarians did not support the law that turned Buenos Aires into the capital city of Argentina and nationalized its port, as the Buenos Aires province would lose the exclusive benefit from it.
_	Act also known as the California Water Code, Section 7 was created in 1969 and is the law that governs the water quality regulation in California.
_	Middletown, New York's "Times Herald-Record", the only local daily newspaper, editorialized against the law that banned the festival from Wallkill.
_	Parliament then adopted on the 9th of December amended the law that an absence of ninety days would make a parliamentary seat vacant, The supreme court would give a judgment on the legality of the O’Neill government on the 12th of December 2011.
_	The "Clinical Officers (Training, Registration and Licensing) Act Cap 260 of 1988" is the law that governs the medical practice of a clinical Officer.
_	Chama Cha Uzalendo for Wiper on the morning of April 5th 2017, in line with the law that requires candidates to change political parties within 90days to election.
_	This means that if they "both" received a majority vote, the proposition that received the "highest" majority vote is the law that would go into effect.
_	He is best known as the minister that authored and countersigned with Princess Isabel, then Princess Imperial Regent the law that ended slavery in Brazil.
_	Murphy has come to realize that standard human laws and protocols, and the bureaucracy that goes with them, are completely incapable of dealing with the true reality of things (a decision confirmed by the slaughter during the jailbreak of the loup-garou she incarcerated in "Fool Moon"), and in her self-appointed pursuit of protecting and 'policing' the supernatural community, she is willing to let slide violations of the law that she would not tolerate during mundane duties; as the creatures she is facing have no belief or respect for human law, she also disregards it.
_	"Fragment G", which Clement of Alexandria (Stromateis 6.52.3-4) related to "On Friends", asserts that there is shared matter between Gnostic Christian material, and material found in "publicly available books"; which is the result of "the law that is written in the [human] heart".
_	The JCPC held in some cases, the law that makes capital punishment mandatory for murder will violate the prohibition on "inhuman or degrading punishment" in the Constitution of Barbados.
_	Some tax evaders believe that they have uncovered new interpretations of the law that show that they are not subject to being taxed (not liable): these individuals and groups are sometimes called tax protesters.
_	Explaining the origins of the law that one can see in the Cities of Refuge and and Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. wrote that early forms of legal procedure were grounded in vengeance.
_	Unfortunately, they get caught up in such a mess with the law that they can't find a way out.
_	There was nothing in the law that would prevent the employees from joining any other collective bargaining group.
_	If the illegality vanishes by result of legislative action (such as if the law that made the act that caused the injury was a crime is repealed) or some subsequent court case (where the law is declared invalid), the tort action will stand.
_	Martin appealed, and the Supreme Court of Virginia reversed, agreeing with Martin's argument that because the United States Supreme Court had decided in "Lawrence v. Texas" that noncommercial, private intimacy was a protected right, the law making fornication a crime was unconstitutional, thus Martin could now sue since the law that made having sex with someone they were not married to was struck down as void.
_	By his active obedience, Christ has "made available a perfect righteousness before the law that is imputed or reckoned to those who put their trust in him."
_	Hoping to improve relations, Chamorro's administration repealled the law that required the country to seek compensation in the case of Nicaragua v. United States, which had long been contentious, and withdrew the suit.
_	Togo does not enforce the law that prevents selling children into sex slavery, and there is also no statutory rape law in Togo.
_	Post deflected criticism of such sensational stories by affirming that he was publicly exposing weaknesses in the law that needed to be rectified.
_	It was due to this incident with the law that Woodberry began to further develop his thoughts regarding Christian ethics, specifically the limitations of government imposed law when it contradicts Christian commandments.
_	In the words of Lord Normand, "It is not the law that precautions must be taken against every peril that can be foreseen by the timorous."
_	He sponsored the law that provides for web based access to reports by lobbyists and those who hire them.
_	Grassby did however push for more immigration from non-English-speaking countries, "banned racially selected sporting teams from playing in Australia and repealed the law that required Indigenous Australians to seek permission before going overseas."
_	However, as a vague term, the definition of a technicality varies from person to person, and it is often simply used to denote any portion of the law that interferes with the outcome desired by the user of the term.
_	This law is the law that has brought Hong Kong the success of being known as the world’s international financial centre.
_	However, the law that created the increases and ultimate repeal of the GST Tax Exemption expired on December 31, 2010.
_	Considered the "Father of Southern Leyte", he authored the law that created the province of Southern Leyte.
_	Gravel was the chief architect of the law that created a regional high school system for rural Alaska; this allowed Alaska Natives to attend schools near where they lived, instead of having to go to schools run by the Bureau of Indian Affairs in the lower 48 states.
_	Prior to this, religious groups could file for an exemption to the law that required stunning if they wanted to slaughter without prior stunning, although no groups had applied for such exemption.
_	But the question of how much we have to learn from foreign law and the international community in interpreting our Constitution is not the only one worth posing.  As "The International Judge" makes clear, we should also question how much we have to learn from international courts and from their men and women judges about judging and the factors outside of the law that influence our decisions.
_	A 2009 reform, effective on 1 March 2010, enables parties to a lawsuit or trial to question the constitutionality of the law that is being applied to them.
_	But he replied that he was a Christian and most ready to undergo any suffering rather than abandon the law that he professed.
_	and with Ronald F. Lee, who was NPS Chief Historian and Director of the Northeast Region and known for his "History of the Antiquities Act" which is the law that serves as the foundation for the commemoration, preservation, and protection of cultural resources in the United States.
_	The Boston Harbor's unique geography inspired the law that made land reclamation such a widespread activity in Boston.
_	Much depends of course on the terms of the court’s order and its reasoning and the application of the doctrine of stare decisis, but as a general rule direct application rules out certain possibilities as constitutionally impermissible, whereas an indirect application merely proposes a construction of the law that conforms to the Constitution.
_	One example of this is the United Kingdom, which has a parental responsibility concept in the law that requires parents to meet the needs of children, such as a right to a home and a right to be maintained.
_	In this way he discovered the electrochemical series, and the law that the electromotive force (emf) of a galvanic cell, consisting of a pair of metal electrodes separated by electrolyte, is the difference between their two electrode potentials (thus, two identical electrodes and a common electrolyte give zero net emf).
_	The legislature also repealed the law that defined any person who was a member of the Confederacy as guilty of treason.
_	The government had little interest in enforcing measures of the law that were not related to Clarín.
_	In a retail market that is decriminalised such as in The Netherlands, where wholesale production is illegal but prosecutions are not always enforced because of the contradiction of the law that is recognised by the courts, competition puts pressure on breeders to create increasingly attractive varieties to maintain market share.
_	It was also part of the law that a husband could not be accused of raping his wife based on marital exemption.
_	A map "Showing Future Pattern of Principal National Routes" was issued by the Ministry of War Transport in 1946 shortly before the law that allowed roads to be restricted to specified classes of vehicle (the Special Roads Act 1949) was passed.
_	It is now the law that dry toilets are no longer allowed due to hygiene reasons.
_	Most importantly, the part of the law that would have required about 700,000 people in the above 53 categories to submit declarations on whether they had spied for the secret services has been thrown out.
_	On the other hand, a certain degree of autonomy was enjoyed by a qadi in that the law that he applied was not the creation of the supreme ruler or the expression of his will.
_	In the event it proved impossible to find a second witness to the charge of treason against Lord Aston, and even at the height of the Plot hysteria, the judges scrupulously observed the law that a charge of treason required two witnesses.
_	The film was controversial as an early example of the rising tide of violence and disrespect for the law that would become key themes in the 1930s.
_	It allows the court to review error of fact or a retroactive change in the law that which affects the validity of the prior proceeding.
_	Citing the Legislature's constant refusal to approve a marriage bill and the law that recognises marriages from other parts of the United Kingdom as civil partnerships, local LGBT rights groups announced that they will turn to the courts for the right to wed.
_	That is, when a defendant is convicted of violating a law only part of which is unconstitutional, and the trial record does not sufficiently demonstrate that he was convicted solely of violating that part of the law that is "constitutional", then the Court will reverse the conviction.
_	Violence won a significant victory on this issue under the United States Supreme Court decision in U.S. v. Castleman, where the Court upheld a definition under the law that will continue to prohibit convicted domestic violence abusers from possessing firearms.
_	"For a retiring lawyer, it is an opportunity to carve out a niche of the law that you care about."
_	On February 21, 1973, law students went on strike and barricaded themselves inside the buildings of the Law School of the University of Athens in the centre of Athens, demanding repeal of the law that imposed forcible drafting of "subversive youths", as 88 of their peers had been forcibly drafted.
_	In a later essay, Abramov argued for the repeal of the law that denied peasants internal passports; he also recommended giving the peasantry larger shares of the profits of their labors.
_	The situation in Sweden had been a bit tense in the countryside in 1650, when the peasantry had protested and boycotted the law that required those living on the land of a noble family to serve in their land, protests which were however successful, as Queen Christina had this duty limited by law.
_	He was elected to the Knesset in 1988 on the Tzomet list, and was one of the instigators of the law that led to direct elections for the Prime Minister.
_	"The William Tyndale Story" is about the man "who in 16th-century England defied the law that forbade translation of the Bible into English."
_	The first gay pride in Ecuador took place in Quito, in 1998, following the Constitutional Court ruling that overturned the law that prohibited sexual acts between people of the same sex.
_	Reference 42 U.S. Code 7405 is the law that created the grant for support of air pollution planning and control programs.
_	"These Tilghmans were so successful in the law that they were both offered the post of State Chief Justice in 1805."
_	He drafted legislation to allow students to earn college credit while they were in still in high school and the law that guaranteed the top ten percent of graduating students a place at a Texas four-year university.
_	He was sentenced to 3000 years, but under the law that was in place during de Juana's trial, the maximum sentence he could serve was 30 years.
_	In 2015, the National Assembly passed an amendment to the law that forbids discrimination of people who have changed their gender.
_	As with the field of consumer protection, the law that FSLRC will propose will have enumerated objectives, enumerated powers and principles that guide the use of the power.
_	Though on March 27, 2009 there was promulgated by the chairwoman Michelle Bachelet the law that establishes the automatic inscription of the voters and that allows the voluntary voting of these, 4 the entry in force of the above mentioned regulation was not applicable in these elections due to the lack of the law that was regulating sayings procesos.5
_	Only one achieved prominence: João Alfredo Correia de Oliveira, who as President of the Council of Ministers would, on 13 May 1888, secure passage of the law that extinguished the last vestiges of slavery in Brazil.
_	In the United Kingdom, it is the law that motorists give way to pedestrians at zebra crossings (Rule 195 of "The Highway Code").
_	The coalition has not dismantled and still campaigns for systematic improvements in the law that would guarantee the security of basic rights in the Internet.
_	Appellate court ruled that Judge John F. Keenan had erred at trial; in denying Banki's defense request to instruct the jury on the law that specifically exempts family money as an exception to the sanctions law, permitting such transfers without the need for a license.
_	The demonstrators demanded lower food prices, wage increases and the revocation of some recent changes in the law that had eroded workers' conditions.
_	At the university, he fought against any relaxation of the law that required entrants to subscribe to the beliefs of the Church of England.
_	To support this interpretation of the "Civil Rights Cases", the Court quoted one of the Congressmen who had supported the law that the "Civil Rights Cases" struck down:
_	Biological warfare is averted when Gunn uses the knowledge of the law that Wolfram & Hart mystically bestowed upon him to prevent the gangster from being incarcerated.
_	Now the King has the option to change the law that legalises a marriage between the princess and CinderElmo.
_	Mukherjee went to visit Kashmir in 1953 and observed a hunger strike to protest the law that prohibited Indian citizens from settling within the state and mandating that they carry ID cards.
_	Vancouver's mayor, Tom Campbell, commented: "I don't like draft dodgers and I'll do anything within the law that allows me to get rid of them."
_	Upon becoming the Speaker, following the law that the Speaker cannot be a member of a party, he left the Democratic Party of Korea.
_	The Jerusalem Talmud answered that he saw the incident and remembered the law that zealots may beat up one who has sexual relations with an Aramean woman.
_	I figured that we'd get what we needed out of the Fakahatchee and at the same time we'd bring so much attention to the law that the legislature would change it.
_	Colonel Kutz responded that Congress had specifically appropriated funds for police officers, and "there is nothing in the law that requires that policemen shall be of the male sex."
_	Age where it's not the law that rules but only the powerful.
_	At the president's request, a new provision has been included in the law that says that people who refuse to enter their personal information in an electronic chip due to their religious beliefs have the right to refuse to use this document or the insertion of such information into the chip.
_	It is necessary to avoid the danger of understanding the practical law simply as the law that tells us to pursue the good, and try to understand the Good as that at which the practical law aims.
_	Joined by Nanki-Poo and Pish-Tush, they try to keep their spirits up ("Brightly dawns our wedding-day"), but soon Ko-Ko and Pooh-Bah enter to inform them of a twist in the law that states that when a married man is beheaded for flirting, his wife must be buried alive ("Here's a how-de-do").
_	She lobbied on behalf of the Arizona Medical Association in the state legislature for various public health issues, and helped pass the law that led to the founding of the Arizona Children's Colony.
_	The United States, acting as libelant, brought an action "in rem" against the book itself rather than the author or importer, a procedure in the law that Morris Ernst, attorney for the publisher, had previously asked to have inserted when the statute was passed by Congress.
_	By the time the law that re-created UDC wound its way through Uganda's parliament in 2015, only one legacy asset remained, "Lake Katwe Salt Works", in Kasese District.
_	The texts dealt primarily with practice and procedure, while the branches of the law that pertain to business transactions, such as private corporations and partnerships, were not readily accessible for student use.
_	Hallam launched a legal challenge in January 2015 challenging the law that prevents him from receiving compensation for the years he wrongly spent in prison.
_	The Sages based their authority to legislate rules equally binding with those laid down in the Torah on the words of "According to the law that they shall teach you . . . you shall do; you shall not turn aside from the sentence that they shall declare to you."
_	Conflicting rumours were then reported that the AKP had proposed a change in the law that would guarantee that İyi would stand in order to prevent a loss of support for perceived undemocratic practices, although the proposal was blocked by the MHP.
_	In December 2015 Marie launched a campaign calling for a change in the law that would prevent convicted murderers who refuse to reveal the location of bodies of victims from being released on parole.
_	In New York a hearing on competence to stand trial may be referred to as a "730 exam", after the law that governs the conduct of the exam, New York CPL Sec. 730.
_	The Immigration Act of 1924 allowed only 150,000 immigrants to the United States per year and set firm quotas for each country, and in midst of the Great Depression there was little popular support for revisions to the law that would allow for a more liberal immigration policy.
_	Therefore, they are not mentioned in the law that determines the administrative divisions of Latvia.
_	On November 28, 1986, MacLean's lawyer filed papers with the Supreme Court of Nova Scotia, challenging the law that stripped him of his seat.
_	The case was brought to court wherein the Cebu Division Superintendent argued that the students and the teacher violated Republic Act No. 1265, the law that makes flag ceremony compulsory for all schools, citing the case of Gerona et al v. Secretary of Education.
_	In December 2013, however, India's top court upheld the law that criminalises gay sex, in a ruling that reverses a landmark 2009 Delhi High Court order which had decriminalised homosexual acts.
_	It extended the law that applied to pawn shops to flea markets.
_	He passed the law that extended family allowances to all workers in commerce and industry.
_	The Residential Tenancies Act (RTA) is the law that governs rental housing agreements (leases) in the Canadian province of Alberta.
_	CCLA mentions inconsistencies in the law that would be disproportionate upon members of minority faith traditions.
_	Again, there are also arguments that there are enough protections in the law that the slippery slope is avoided.
_	He wrote the law that created the New Jersey Economic Development Authority and was co-counsel on bond issue for New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority.
_	The 56th protest occurred on 9 January, with hundreds of farmers gathered in La Fonseca, demanding that Law 840, the law that granted the construction of the Nicaragua Canal, be revoked.
_	The advantages of this rule for international financial transactions is that wherever securities are located or regardless of how many offices and branches a financial institution has, persons dealing in the securities can know the law that will govern a transaction such as a sale, a pledge or a loan of securities.
_	Along with Senator William Daum Euler, Hayden helped change the law that had prohibited the sale of margarine in Canada.
_	There is a possibility in the law that the only parent who held Italian citizenship on the birth date of a child born with "jus sanguinis" Italian citizenship was the mother, who previously acquired the Italian citizenship by marriage to the father, who relinquished his own Italian citizenship before the child was born.
_	Legislation sponsored by Sweeney and signed into law provides state pensions to surviving family members of police, firefighters and emergency services workers who die in the line of duty, as well as the law that removes the remarriage prohibition to receive death benefits for spouses of police officers and firefighters killed while serving the public good.
_	On March 2011, the Knesset passed the law that effectively adopted the committee’s recommendations and raised taxing significantly.
_	Although city land use regulations at the time were intended to limit skyscrapers to about 50 stories, the developer, Martin Selig, obtained the necessary permits for a 76-story skyscraper due to a part of the law that allowed bonus height for providing retail space with street access.
_	He said "We strongly discourage work in the settlements, since the entire enterprise is illegal and illegitimate...but given the high unemployment rate and the lack of alternatives, we do not enforce the law that criminalizes work in the settlements."
_	The advice on the law that would have put the Egmont pact in practice was, on a number of points, heavily criticised by the Council of State.
_	Obama said in his 2010 State of the Union Address: "This year, I will work with Congress and our military to finally repeal the law that denies gay Americans the right to serve the country they love because of who they are."
_	Some patent attorneys have expressed surprise at this decision since, while the merits of Macrossan's case might have been arguable, it was felt that there are issues with the law that require resolving.
_	This action was of purely administrative nature (and thus excluded any possibility of appeal) and struck, according to unofficial estimates, over 18,000 people, including some who had actually left the country, while others were simply unaware of the existence of the law that required them to confirm their status through a new application.
_	Pafford earned the endorsement of "The Palm Beach Post", which criticized Donnally and praised Pafford for his support for Medicaid expansion under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and for his opposition to the law that required the closing of "the state's only tuberculosis sanatorium."
_	The vignettes were quite subtle, and more often than not, despite many guesses, the panellists were unable to come up with the law that was actually being broken.
_	The parts of the law that allow civil partnerships to be converted into marriages, and allow married people to change their legal gender while remaining married, came into force on 10 December 2014.
_	On 1 September 1972, the enforcement of the law that expanded the Icelandic fishery limits to began.
_	Despite this, section 38 of the Police Reform Act 2002 (the law that made PCSOs) requires that chief constables or Commissioners in charge of police forces have a duty to ensure a recruit "is a suitable person to carry out the functions for the purposes of which they are designated" and is "capable of effectively carrying out those functions".
_	On 11 May 2017, the president of Brazil, Michel Temer, sanctioned the law that creates the National Civil Identification (NCI).
_	The amendment was authored by Senator Carl Levin who stated, "This amendment corrects an anomaly in the law that unfairly disadvantaged some people who had begun their naturalization process before 2002.
_	Italy's Constitutional Court has now declared the law that shortening the exchange period of Italian lira unlawful.
_	First, Bashar al-Assad removed the law that forbids girls to wear hijab at public schools, then he recognized al-Qubaysiat and called them to openly carry out their activities in public mosques.
_	On December 9, 1824, the Senate voted to repeal the law that had established the Court of Appeals and to establish a new Court of Appeals with four justices.
_	On September 7, 2016 the Seoul National University Human Rights Guidelines were added upon during a meeting which unanimously voted to pass the law that prevents people from discriminating against sexual minorities.
_	Circumcision performed for the purpose of being "saved" meant a full, formal conversion to Judaism, complete with a baptism into Judaism and an embracing of the rabbis' entire Oral Law (probably the law that Peter had in mind when he referred to "a yoke ... which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear) ...
_	On 30 September 2016, the Parliament of Bulgaria, backed by the Patriotic Front passed the law that outlaws wearing burqas by women in public places in an effort to combat terrorism and migrants flowing through Europe.
_	The Montana Court believed that this ruling does not blatantly contradict "Citizens United" because the ruling deals with a law that has major differences from the McCain-Feingold Act (the law that "Citizens United" partially overturned).
_	In Lord Diplock's words, this ground means that the decision maker "must understand correctly the law that regulates his decision-making power and must give effect to it".
_	In "Government v. Springer", Malcolm refused to affirm the law that granted the Senate President and Speaker of the House the right to vote shares in a government corporation, citing that such authority did not fall within the functions of the legislature.
_	The British were interested in administering law in India, but they wanted to administer the law that already existed to the people.
_	The petition called for a change to the law that disallows two people of the same sex from getting married, by amending the "Marriage (Scotland) Act 1977".
_	Accordingly, the county courts and county commissioners undertook their business in the village, fulfilling their duties in assorted buildings because of the lack of a dedicated courthouse: the law that organized the county provided that $7,000 (then a large sum) must be donated by private citizens or that two years must pass without the donation of $7,000 before county officials might levy taxes for the erection of a courthouse and jail.
_	As such, the PRD was not assigned any plurinominal seat to comply with the law that prevents over-representation.
_	In 1992, John Burchard, who had been the State Commissioner of Social and Rehabilitation Services, and Vanessa L. Malcarne, published an article in "Behavioral Sciences and the Law", encouraging changes in the law that would have allowed the raid to succeed.
_	The judge denied the request as being beyond the scope of his authority, citing the law that limits gun permits for convicted criminals – a law that Cunningham voted for while in Congress.
_	He advocated a comprehensive workmen's compensation law, but the law that was passed in the 1914 General Assembly was later declared unconstitutional.
_	President Yanukovych and other Government officials have hinted that the law that convicted Tymoshenko could be changed in her benefit.
_	In terms of the law that "Any two time-lines approximate to the exact degree to which their material contents are alike" the tower is obviously a repeat, on a grand scale, of the Othertimers' successful but small experiment with a railway shed constructed in the same space as ours.
_	That same day, the law that integrates numerous taxi drivers integrated in the Health System in a ceremony at the Presidential Palace, accompanied by Congressman Mauricio Mulder and several party members.
_	On December 27, 2010, President Islam Karimov signed an amendment to the law that strengthened the protection of the country's symbols, including its flag and emblem.
_	Løvenskiold argued against the law that Norway’s king, and thus the Kingdom’s government, had granted his family eternal noble status, and the letters patent of 1739 uses the expression ‘eternally’.
_	Moreover, this sacred text is not the authoritative statement of Hebrew law, for priestly transmission has distorted the law, the law that had an independent existence in the Israelite state.
_	John F. Keenan denied the Banki's defense request to instruct the jury on the law that specifically permits family money as an exception to the sanctions law, permitting such transfers without the need for a license:
_	But this love that is as strong as death ultimately transcends itself, as it takes the form of God's law — for it is the law that binds Israel as a people, and through observance of the law that each Jew relives the moment of revelation at Mt. Sinai.
_	Diana pointed out the law that passed was not as strong as she advocated for.
_	Ed Yates admits to Renchler that he killed Martin, but employee Chet Huneker is persuaded to tell the law that he hit Martin accidentally with a car.
_	On November 20 of 1970, the Presidential Decree no 70-312 which is bound to the law that had created the ICCN previous year, was signed into force by Joseph Désiré Mobutu.
_	The members of the Cortes, who vehemently opposed the legalization of the Communist Party (PCE), added an amendment to the law that banned political organizations that "submitted to an international discipline" and "advocated for the implantation of a totalitarian regime".
_	Act of 2006 clarifies words written in the law that formerly were ambiguous and confusing such as: anatomical gift, record, refusal, guardian, prospective donor, reasonably available, and disinterested witness.
_	Established in 2000, the ministry exercises vigilance and protection of society and victims of crime by promoting the investigation of criminal acts and criminal actions against offenders of the law that violate public order and security.
_	The Bill is for the law that school buses must stop at railroad crossings.
_	The disadvantages of "stare decisis" include its rigidity, the complexity of learning law, the differences between some cases may be very small and appear illogical, and the slow growth or incremental changes to the law that are in need of major overhaul.
_	"We urge President Karzai to review the law's legal status to correct provisions of the law that ... limit or restrict women's rights," said United States spokesman.
_	Because he operates on principles of eternal, universal, and never-deviating law, any individual who abides the law that entitles him to get revelation can know exactly and precisely what President Kimball knows, can entertain angels just as well as Joseph Smith entertained them, and can be in tune in full measure with all of the things of the Spirit."
_	The project completed, President Domingo Faustino Sarmiento sent a note to the Congress on August 25, 1869 proposing the law that would ratify the project of the Civil Code.
_	Adeola was reputed to have been instrumental to the enactment of the law that strengthened the Lagos State Internal Revenue Service, a legislation that catapulted the revenue of the state from N5billion monthly to over N20billion.
_	Therefore, the law that applies to the armed conflict between Israel and the terrorist organizations is the international law of armed conflicts."
_	Earlier, CBCP president Angel Lagdameo pointed out at least 5 provisions of the law that may threaten civil liberties:
_	In 1826, General Justo José de Urquiza, in his role as the governor of Entre Rios, promoted the law that gave Concepción del Uruguay range city.
_	In 2010, Elias sought advisory opinions from the Federal Election Commission declaring that certain Google and Facebook advertisements were covered by the "small items" and "impracticable" exemptions of the law that otherwise requires a political advertisement to include a disclaimer revealing who paid for it.
_	By that time Marcel Florkin became head of the Direction of Higher Education in Belgium’s Ministry of Public Instruction, and under his administration passed the law that enabled war veterans to pursue higher education without diploma or other examinations.
_	As such, they could not exercise the federal judicial power, and therefore the law that placed admiralty cases in their jurisdiction was unconstitutional.
_	It was the chartered version of the law that was included in the statute books and that was printed and published for the knowledge of the people.
_	Koenig was the primary sponsor to a change in the law that prevents federally-certified radiologists from analyzing X-rays to assess black lung compensation claims, restricting such determinations to pulmonologists.
_	On May 23, 2017, Ukrainian parliament approved the law that most of the broadcast content should be in Ukrainian (75% of national carriers and 50% of local carriers).
_	The trial record indicates that Rusticus asked him several questions about Christian beliefs and practices, after which he affirmed the law that failure to sacrifice to the gods in submission to the Imperial decrees was a capital offence.
_	In February 2013 it was reported that the Georgian Government was considering amendments to the law that would decriminalize entry into Abkhazia and South Ossetia from territories other than those controlled by Georgia and make it an administrative offense subject to financial penalty instead of prison term.
_	The Russian Customs Code is the law that regulates customs for Russia.
_	He was by this time chairman of the Senate Committee on Naval Affairs, and the law that Congress passed was recognized as coming from his hand.
_	Section Four of the law that created the Department declares that the United States Secretary of State will have custody and charge of all records, books, and papers collected in the past years under the Continental Congress and the government under the Articles of Confederation.
_	"It is not often in the law that so few have so quickly changed so much," Justice Breyer said of the Court's decision.
_	The second step is the identification of the law that brings social objects into being, namely that
_	During this period he signed the law that introduced reforms to the Constitution of 1833.
_	Both Israeli and migrant workers rallied against the law that separates parents from their children.
_	Despite previous extensions of the law that allowed for the statewide database, the General Assembly did not renew the database and instead let it sunset.
_	Explaining the origins of the law that one can see in the Cities of Refuge, Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. wrote that early forms of legal procedure were grounded in vengeance.
_	Jones accepted a ride home after visiting a bar, and the undercover officer driving the car arrested her under the law that she had been protesting.
_	This is because, in granting citizenship to all men in the provinces, much private law had to be re-written to conform with the law that applied to Roman citizens in Rome.
_	A Soviet law that had invalidated all legislation passed under the Nazi occupation was used in order to justify the closures of churches that had been re-opened during the war; this constituted most of the re-opened churches, while churches in other parts of the country were closed with other legal justification (such as the law that forced employers to make sure that their employees had a residence in their area, which was used to make missionary priests illegal).
_	Kretschmar then wrote directly to Hitler, asking that he investigate the case and overrule the law that prevented "This Monster" (as he described his child) from being killed.
_	The attitude he took in the matter resulted in the repeal of the law that authorized the increase.
_	The LRTA was created in September 1974 under Chapter 161B of the Massachusetts General Laws, the law that impacts all transit authorities in the state of Massachusetts.
_	During his time at the Treasury, he chaired the committee that revised Italian corporate and financial legislation and drafted the law that governs Italian financial markets.
_	Initially, the law that would recognize registered partnerships with most of the rights enjoyed by heterosexual couples was planned, but the right-wing Croatian Peasant Party that was the only right-wing party of the coalition threatened to leave the Government should they insist on this law, so the compromise had to be reached in order to save the Government.
_	It was first suggested by Nils Halan that the inscription refers to a national event, the establishment of the law that formally made Christianity the religion of Norway at the Moster Thing in either 1022 or 1024 by King Olaf Haraldsson.
_	On 16 September 2015 the Ukrainian parliament voted for the law that sets 20 February 2014 as the official date of the Russian temporary occupation of Crimean peninsula.
_	With the help of Mordechai, she asks the king to create the law that for one day, the Jews can defend themselves against any that are persecuting them, and the king grants her request.
_	The tragic events that happened at Hangar 13 precipitated an amendment to the law that licences were required for the safeguarding of the health and safety of those attending similar events.
_	On February 29, 2012, Bolton ruled in favor of an action led by the Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund and blocked provisions of the law that allowed for the arrest of day workers who block traffic in an effort to gain employment.
_	J Street applauded Miliband's rejection of the warrant and "his promise to pursue a change in the law that would prevent unfortunate events like these from happening in the future."
_	In virtue of these principles of legality, there is an inner morality to the law that imposes a minimal morality of fairness.
_	But even in these cases, he argues, there are positive features of the law that impose a defensible moral duty to obey them.
_	In 2007 she was sentenced to 18 months in jail, when she was DTP chairwoman, over the distribution of party leaflets in the Kurdish language, a violation of the law that requires all political literature be in Turkish.
_	Instead, Livingstone got on board with a campaign known as "Keep Fares Fair" in order to bring about a change in the law that would make the Fares Fair policy legal; an alternate movement, "Can't Pay, Won't Pay", accused Livingstone of being a sell-out and insisted that the GLC proceed with its policies regardless of their legality.
_	This classification of ancestry and social class was separate from the legal status derived from "partus sequitur ventrem", the law that made children born to slave mothers also slaves.
_	It is a statement of the power and creative potential inherent in the law that was used by medieval kings when assenting to bills passed by Parliament – "let the law be made."
_	This is explicitly stated in the law that authorizes GSEs, on the securities themselves, and in public communications issued by the FHLMC.
_	Chris Keates, the general secretary of National Association of Schoolmasters Union of Women Teachers, said that teachers who have sex with pupils over the age of consent should not be placed on the sex offenders register and that prosecution for statutory rape "is a real anomaly in the law that we are concerned about."
_	Jones was well loved all over the Philippine archipelago for his work for the passage of the law that bears his name.
_	Starting from 1908, with the approval of the law that introduced the festive Sunday, the Italian sports movement found the space to develop all sports.
_	This is one of the few changes in the law that is beneficial for employees, but represents an additional administrative task for employers.
_	Punitive damages are most important for violations of the law that are hard to detect.
_	Reference 49 U.S. Code 5309 is the law that created the program.
_	As Chairman of the Senate Banking Committee, Garn was co-author of the Garn–St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982, the law that partially deregulated the savings and loan industry and attempted to forestall the looming Savings and Loan crisis.
_	Blackwell was also heavily involved in legislation to create the Pennsylvania Convention Center and in passing the law that broke Philadelphia's long-standing building height limit, allowing for the construction of Philadelphia's One Liberty Place.
_	The video, posted the morning of 21 February 2018, was part of a campaign urging the United States to suspend its ties with Poland over the law that criminalizes blaming the Polish nation or state for German Nazi crimes.
_	H.R. 2641 would amend the Administrative Procedures Act, the law that governs how federal agencies propose and establish regulations.
_	Capus obtained passage of the law that originated the "Appellation d'origine contrôlée" (AOC).
_	Regardless of the irregularities, the verdict stood, and established the law that it was High Treason for any minister of the Established Church to dispute the authority of the King and the Privy Council in religious matters.
_	He was the author of the law that incorporated the Sorocabana Railroad to the São Paulo State patrimony.
_	In Administrative Law (the law that controls government action and decisions) a delegation is the process of handing some administrative action or decision to a subordinate.
_	In 1971, in the controversial case of "Milirrpum v Nabalco Pty Ltd", popularly known as the Gove land rights case, Justice Richard Blackburn ruled that Australia had been considered "desert and uncultivated" (a term which included territory in which resided "uncivilized inhabitants in a primitive state of society") before European settlement, and therefore, by the law that applied at the time, open to be claimed by right of occupancy, and that there was no such thing as native title in Australian law.
_	Generally, the law that allows the secured debt to be made also provides a procedure whereby the property will be sold at public auction, or through some other means of sale.
_	Louisiana bans hog-catching but permits bay dog or herding events after the Louisiana Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals worked on the law that exempted Uncle Earl's, and other baying and herding events.
_	Use of the law that criminalizes the homeless generally takes on one of five forms:
_	Not because I have no confidence in you, but it is the law that does not concern me.
_	Prior to 1981 Wisconsin had an exception to the law that allowed adults who were guilty of sex with minors 15 or older to use as a defense that the victim understood the nature of the sexual act, but there was a rebuttable presumption in Wisconsin that minors under the age of 18 were not capable of informed consent to sex, but as stated, this could be argued against by the defendant in the court of law if the minor was 15 years of age or older.
_	As a result, the official text of the UCC now corresponds to the law that most states have enacted.
_	This led to a change in the law that decreed that women (and men under sixteen) could not raise a manslaughter action.
_	Jacques Philippe Delmas de Grammont, a former cavalry officer, created a league for the protection of the horse in 1850 and helped to pass the law that bears his name that year, prohibiting the deliberate abuse of animals.
_	He advocated for the issuance of the law that created the Autonomous University of Mexico.
_	Opposition parties, lower middle class voters and certain members of Bachelet's New Majority coalition attacked the proposals as the law that would prevent individuals from earning profits on public resources would not address making improvements in quality of education.
_	Ezra restores the law that was destroyed with the burning of the Temple in Jerusalem.
_	To comply with the law that an MP cannot represent more than one constituency, he vacated the Vadodara seat.
_	On 10 April 2008, the Supreme Court of India upheld the law that provides for 27% reservation for Other Backward Castes (OBCs) in educational institutions supported by the Central government, while ruling that the creamy layer among the OBCs should be excluded from the quota.
_	In October 2004, a "John Doe" lawsuit was filed by an anonymous National Guardsman facing stop-loss, challenging the validity of the law that authorized it.
_	He expressed his belief in Piper by saying, "If you wish to upset the law that all crows are black, it is enough if you prove that one crow is white.
_	The "Republikschutzgesetz" had explicitly stated that the former Emperor Wilhelm II was banned from Germany for life, an aspect of the law that greatly offended the DNVP at the time.
_	Therefore, the law that exists at the time of the appeal might be different from the law that existed at the time of the events that are in controversy under civil or criminal law in the case at hand.
_	Reynolds JA rejected the proposition that doctors could not be negligent if they acted in accordance with the usual and customary practice and procedure in their “medical community”, holding that "it is not the law that, if all or most of the medical practitioners in Sydney habitually fail to take an available precaution to avoid foreseeable risk of injury to their patients, then none can be found guilty of negligence".
_	Speakers focused on the section of the law that requires people to use bathrooms in public facilities that correspond to the sex on their birth certificate and quoted biblical scripture in defense of the law.
_	There is no mention in the law that such activities already fall under the jurisdiction of state agriculture departments.
_	The zoo was originally opened in 1954, when legislator Benjamin Cole authored the law that created the zoo.
_	The jurisdiction of a qadi was theoretically coextensive with the scope of the law that he applied.
_	International Navigation lobbied the US Congress to replace the subsidy and allow the Inman speedsters to register in the US despite the law that only permitted US-built ships to be registered there.
_	In 2011, Sali Berisha who was President at the time admitted "By 2003, the Albanian Parliament passed the law that recognized the attributes of the Royal Family and it was a right decision.
_	He was good on his feet, articulate, with a sense of the law that was common-sensical, more intuitive than based on books."
_	The money was income in the hands of the trustees and we know of nothing in the law that prevented its being paid and received as income by the donee.
_	It was organized like an army, divided into sections of twenty members each (to evade the law that forbade the association of more than twenty persons), with a president and vice president for each section.
_	The enactment of "the law that whoever sold his wife should be given over to the infernal gods" was, according to John Andrew Couch in 1894, credited to Romulus.
_	The Lei Áurea (; ), adopted on May 13, 1888, was the law that abolished slavery in Brazil.
_	Karma is not itself "reward and punishment", but the law that produces consequence.
_	Explaining the origins of the law that one can see in the Cities of Refuge, Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. wrote that early forms of legal procedure were grounded in vengeance.
_	In November 2014, MacLaren introduced a private member's bill to repeal the law that grants environmental protections for the Niagara Escarpment for the second time.
_	The court wrote, "It is not now and has never been the law that a man assailed in his own dwelling is bound to retreat."
_	III issued a ruling blocking part of the law that would have closed JWHO.
_	This refers to the law that has the greatest relevance to the issues involved.
_	After the promulgation of the law that gave Rosario city status, the governor of Santa Fe José María Cullen, Oroño's brother-in-law, named him political chief of the city.
_	""We had to reconsider everything, in the beginning we were all out for everything, but then we realised that there’s something called the law that we had to respect, we had to follow.
_	The Immigration (European Economic Area) Regulations 2006 (or "EEA Regulations" for short) amended by SI 2009/1117, SI 2011/1247 and SI 2015/694 constitute the law that implements the right of free movement of EEA nationals and their family members in the United Kingdom.
_	It is subject (like every other type of energy) to the law that "Energy cannot be destroyed, only converted into another form."
_	In 1994, she set up a support group for rape victims and their families, and also helped to campaign for a change in the law that prevented people accused of rape from cross-examining their alleged victims.
_	That law which a people established for itself is peculiar to it and is called "ius civile" (civil law) as being the special law of that "civitas" (state), while the law that natural reason establishes among all mankind is followed by all peoples alike, and is called "ius gentium" (law of nations, or law of the world) as being the law observed by all mankind.
_	Wherefore officially valid data about districts conformation for metropolitan areas in Peru are those issued by official documents issued and validated by the respective municipal governments of each city under the law that local governments are autonomous political, economic and administrative matters within its jurisdiction and its powers according to the law of municipalities, an attribution of these is to approve the urban development plan.
_	These actions were the culmination of a long struggle that began in 1913 and ended in 1949, when President Gabriel González Videla signed the law that granted the right to vote in all elections to women in Chile.
_	During one of his interim tenures, he approved the law that created the music schools of Puerto Rico.
_	In 1926, now President of the Chamber of Deputies, he moved the law that created the current building for the Faculty of Medicine.
_	Lee, emphasised the need to decriminalised sex work, and is currently challenging the law that criminalises sex clients.
_	Under the imminent lawless action test, speech is not protected by the First Amendment if the speaker intends to incite a violation of the law that is both imminent and likely.
_	This is the law that no senator or member of the General Assembly can hold any other Federal or State position, and also cannot be a judge.
_	For instance, in "Strauder v. West Virginia" the Court sided with those who wished to overturn the law that excluded black citizens from juries, which suggests that the Court was beginning to build a set of cases that enumerated rights based on the new amendments
_	Consequently, Congress created a separate offense under 18 U.S.C. § 666 to ensure the integrity of federal program funds administered through private organizations and state, local, or Indian tribal government agencies and to fill an apparent gap in the law that neither 18 U.S.C. § 641 nor § 665 could reach.
_	The JCPC held in some cases, the law that makes capital punishment mandatory for murder will violate the prohibition on "inhuman or degrading punishment" in the Constitution of Trinidad and Tobago.
_	In this case (involving Nadab and Abihu), because of his anger, Moses forgot the law that those in the first stage of mourning ("onen"), prior to the burial of their dead, are prohibited from eating the meat of sacrifices.
_	"Spouses" include married couples as well as those, of same or opposite gender, who satisfy criteria for being in a "marriage-like relationship" for a time period that depends on the law that is being considered.
_	Patric is currently pursuing changes to the law that bars his parental rights.
_	The court's ruling explicitly drew attention to a perceived shortcoming of the law that there was no criminal liability under the Copyright Act for even large-scale non-commercial copyright infringement.
_	Reference 23 U.S. Code 149 is the law that created the program.
_	On 9 November 2015, Ismail claims that he was not aware of the law that prohibits the possession and consumption of turtle eggs in Sabah, which is one of the protected species under the Sabah Wildlife Conservation Enactment 1997.
_	In 2008, Anderson described himself as a judicial "moderate," and added that he "would like to be thought of as a judge who had no particular agenda and who took each case on the facts and applied the law that the Supreme Court laid down," regardless of his own personal view on it.
_	Reference 49 U.S. Code 5308 is the law that created the program.
_	"When they do, it becomes apparent that the sacred object is also a piece of property, protected by the law that protects property and this whole apparatus that defends Christmas: fences and lights, tracking devices and private security companies, patrolling police and the courts.
_	The important parliamentary activities that Wissell participated in during his time in the Reichstag included the vote on the Enabling Act in March 1933: here, he was one of 94 members who voted against the law that created the legal foundations for the Nazi dictatorship.
_	During his tenure as State Senator, he authored the law that made Sacramento the permanent seat of government in the State of California.
_	At this time it was still the law that the president of the LVA had to appoint the directors of the “"Ortskrankenkasssen"” and because they lacked their own administration, they turned to the ‘big brother’ for help.
_	The department also deals with youth justice, a section of the law that deals mainly with offending by young people aged 14–16 years, and adoption through "The Adoption Information and Services Unit" (AISU).
_	In the Mishnaic era it became the law that only someone who had "semikhah" could give religious and legal decisions.
_	But Madam Sorbin divides their support by passing the law that women should all become ugly, so that men would not woo them and they would not risk being enslaved once more.
_	When Colorado voters passed the law that decriminalized marijuana, the voters approved using tax money generated from marijuana sales for schools, police, and drug education.
_	On October 12, 2010, U.S. federal judge Virginia Phillips ordered the Department of Defense to stop enforcing “don’t ask, don’t tell” –the law that prohibits openly gay people from serving in the military.
_	Deputy Prime Minister Pongthep Thepkanchana responded to the statement on behalf of the government, "February 2, 2014, was set as the election date in the royal decree dissolving Parliament, and there is nothing within the constitution or the law that gives the government the authority to change this date."
_	During 1896–1897, a long series of strikes forced the government to grant, on 16 June 1897, the law that lowered the duration of the working day to 11.5 hours.
_	The film briefly mentions the attempts to pass the law that would become the Superfund.
_	DeMar has said that not all homosexuals would be executed under a "reconstructed government" but that he did believe that the occasional execution of "sodomites" would serve society well because "the law that requires the death penalty for homosexual acts effectively drives the perversion of homosexuality underground, back into the closet"
_	Henry Maine argued that legal fictions seem an ornate outgrowth of the law that ought to be removed by legislation.
_	He was also instrumental in passing the law that allowed formation of port districts.
_	Chadwick was dissatisfied with the law that resulted from his report.
_	Hence, most legal systems have opted for what English law calls the "proper law" approach: the identification and application of the law that has the closest connection with the cause(s) of action.
_	As later summarized by the Roman jurist Papinian (c. 148–211), the law that was developed by the Praetors in their Edict became an instrument which could supplement, explain, and improve the Ius civile.
_	The new state law supports the Ann Arbor City charter by offering protection from state law enforcement for qualifying patients and their assigned primary caregivers under the law that took effect on April 4, 2009.
_	Indeed, so many "amicus curiae" briefs have been filed regarding the law that size limits were imposed upon them.
_	Speaking on the Street Offences bill 1959 she criticised the law that blamed women for seeking income from prostitution, and instead sought to punish the men.
_	He co-drafted Malta's Whistle Blower Act, Party Financing Act and the law that removed politician's legal protection from cases of abuse and corruption.
_	That same year was formalized by Governor Jânio Quadros the law that created the city of Itapevi.
_	The Torah contains the law that, "When men fight, and one of them pushes a pregnant woman, and a miscarriage results, but no other misfortune, the one responsible shall be fined...but if other misfortune ensues, the penalty shall be life (nefesh) for life (nefesh)."
_	Even so, Van Notten points out areas in the law that are in need of change.
_	One of Eucken's students, was the author of the law that abruptly abolished price controls ("Leitsätzegesetz") in June 1948.
_	Rabbi Jose the Galilean taught that the "certain men who were unclean by the dead body of a man, so that they could not keep the Passover on that day" in were those who bore Joseph's coffin, as implied in and The Gemara cited their doing so to support the law that one who is engaged on one religious duty is free from any other.
_	The doctor explains he is exempted from the law that requires people to lodge soldiers.
_	The "Times" calls that status "a gray area of the law that meant he would not get a green card but could remain in the United States".
_	They also struck down part of the law that put the onus on an importer to prove material was not obscene.
_	Though not an absolute defense, it is true that the law that made the fraud possible had been written before he was elected to Congress.
_	Later that year, he granted royal assent to the law that abolished the seigneurial system in Quebec, and then resigned as Governor-General.
_	Although BTP polices in Scotland (D Division) it does not have any PCSOs in Scotland due to limitations of the Police Reform Act 2002, the law that empowers PCSOs which does not extend to Scotland.
_	Even as late as 1813 it was the law that whoever rented a dwelling-house or a storeroom to a Jew for an extended term would be fined 100 gulden; a 2nd offense of the same nature entailed loss of the privileges of citizenship.
_	After serving as a member of the New Jersey General Assembly from 1972 to 1976, where he authored the law that created the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, was co-counsel on bond issue for New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority, and pushed hard for the introduction of state income tax, and as Executive Director of the Passaic County Democratic Committee from 1977 to 1981, he was elected as a Democrat to the 103rd United States Congress in 1992 to succeed retiring eleven-term incumbent Robert Roe in the historically Democratic eighth district.
_	Under the law that authorized the project, water levels in wells that existed outside the project boundary before pumping started must not drop more than ,
_	Israeli occupation forces accepted that the West Bank would be governed under the law that was in effect before June 5, 1967 with the condition that "security enactments take precedence over all law, even if they do not explicitly repeal it."
_	He sponsored the law that established a workers' compensation system in Texas and established the Texas Industrial Accident Board, and the law restricting work to eight hours a day.
_	In "Lac Minerals Ltd. v. International Corona Resources Ltd.", the Supreme Court of Canada held that a breach of confidence action is "sui generis" and the courts may rely on all three traditional jurisdictional bases for action (contract, equity and property) to enforce the policy of the law that confidences are to be respected.
_	Melanie Randall, who drafted some of the legal arguments for LEAF, said that the decision does not change the law and merely reaffirms the law that has been in place since 1983.
_	The bishop refuses to marry Alan and the girl, because it is the law that consent must be asked three times.
_	In Babylon, around the 1700s BC, the law that applied was King Hammurabi's Code.
_	In March 2016, the "New York Times" reported that Garcia was put in a "gray area" of the law that meant he could remain in the U.S. from 1962 to 1966.
_	Report found that "the government enforced the law that criminalizes homosexual conduct and did not respond to societal discrimination" and that "societal violence against homosexual persons occurred, as did societal discrimination in employment, housing, and access to education or health care."
_	The planning regions of Latvia are not administrative territorial divisions, since they are not mentioned in the law that prescribes the administrative territorial divisions of Latvia.
_	On October 2009, Tajikistan adopted the law that removes Russian as the "language for interethnic communication."
_	The predecessor schools were not eligible for PUF allocations, but the law that created UTRGV made the new institution PUF-eligible, and was passed by the required two-thirds vote of both legislative chambers.
_	There, one of his significant acts was to have the law that forbade marriage between a woman and her brother-in-law repealed.
_	In the GCHQ case, Lord Diplock formulated the concept of illegality as one where "the decision-maker must understand correctly the law that regulates his decision-making power and must give effect to it."
_	The Commission had a troubled start because the law that created it failed to give it adequate enforcement powers.
_	Canby, film critic for "The New York Times," believes the film missed its mark, and wrote, "The screenplay, by David Ward and John Nichols, based on Mr. Nichols's novel, is jammed with underdeveloped, would-be colorful characters, including a philosophical Chicano angel, who face a succession of fearful confrontations with the law that come to nothing.
_	A map "Showing Future Pattern of Principal National Routes" was issued by the Ministry of War Transport in 1946 shortly before the law that allowed roads to be restricted to specified classes of vehicle (the Special Roads Act 1949) was passed.
_	Animo is a Latin term used in the law that means with intention or with purpose.
_	Dodd argued that the law that enables the president to make recess appointments was not created to get around the approval of the Senate.
_	The substantive provisions of the Act could be codified (arranged by subject matter) in one or more titles of the United States Code while the provisions of the law that have not reached their "effective date" (remaining uncodified) would be available by reference to the United States Statutes at Large.
_	In the 17th century, and perhaps earlier when the law that became known as buttock mail was passed, buttock was a colloquial term for a prostitute.
_	Citing the Assembly's constant refusal to approve a marriage bill and the law that recognises marriages from other parts of the United Kingdom as civil partnerships, Amnesty International and local LGBT rights group Rainbow Project announced that a court challenge against Northern Ireland's same-sex marriage ban was likely to proceed on human rights grounds.
_	"You're the law that I want (Yes on 2)", a 2014 parody of the song "You're the one that I want" from "Grease", interpreted by Berke and model Briley Hale, invited Florideans to vote for Amendment 2 concerning the "Florida Right to Medical Marijuana Initiative."
_	In 2000 he introduced a bill (vetoed by President Clinton) "that would have broadened the law that criminalizes release of national defense information."
_	“While our investigation did not find sufficient evidence to support a criminal charge, we are recommending enhancements to current state campaign finance laws to address the ambiguities in the law that gave rise to these allegations,” Essex District Attorney Jonathan Blodgett said.
_	The British suffragette journal "Common Cause" excoriated not only the law that had condemned Angelina, but also the justice system that upheld it as “both bad, for they are exclusively masculine.
_	In his first term in office, he authored the law that divided the province of Zamboanga into the provinces of Zamboanga del Norte and Zamboanga del Sur.
_	Until 1977 it was the law that a married woman needed her husband's agreement in order to obtain an employment contract, and if such consent was given, it was also up to the husband to decide what purpose the wife's earnings would be used for.
_	However, NGOs criticize gaps in the law that allow the prosecution service to request such data directly from the service providers without court authorization.
_	Despite previous extensions of the law that allowed for the statewide database, the General Assembly did not renew the database and instead let it sunset.
_	Lord Hoffmann restated the law that a document's meaning is what it would mean (1) to a reasonable person (2) with knowledge of the context, or the whole matrix of fact (3) except prior negotiations (4) and meaning does not follow what the dictionary says but meaning understood from its context (5) and the meaning should not contradict common sense.
_	The rule was based on the law that the prophet Muhammad is "the father of the orphans", and on the fact that the Jews in Yemen were considered "under protection", and the ruler was obligated to care for them.
_	We came down here to offer evidence in this case and the court has held under the law that the evidence we had is not admissible, so all we can do is to take an exception and carry it to a higher court to see whether the evidence is admissible or not...we cannot even explain to you that we think you should return a verdict of not guilty.
_	He later grounds his argument on the thesis that Shylock and Antonio act as representatives of Judaism and Christianity, respectively, and that it is Shylock's absolute deference to the law that necessarily brings about his downfall.
_	"While the Food and Drug act remains a foundational law of the FDA mission, it's not the law that created the FDA.
_	Iraq is unique in that it is stated in the law that infidelity constitutes as a valid reason for divorce.
_	Senator Butler had written a loophole in the law that allowed Sanborn to collect the commissions, but Sanborn would not reveal whom he split the profits with.
_	The majority said that the law that provided less social assistance to youth was connected to the ability of youth to find employment easily.
_	To get around this, the Romans castrated roosters (capon), which resulted in a doubling of size despite the law that was passed in Rome that forbade the consumption of fattened chickens.
_	Students are introduced philosophical foundations underlying "black letters" of the codes or legislation and are encouraged to discuss, articulate legal reasoning, advance arguments and think of "the law that ought to be" in tandem with "the law that is".
_	§4 of the law that introduced this reform said:
_	By mid-September Jaurès was writing that the company was breaking the law that made intimidating an elector by threat of dismissal from employment a criminal offense.
_	This means, for instance, that the activities of the Ombudsmen are not intended to replace the supervision and application of the law that devolves on other organisations in the community.
_	Space law is an area of the law that encompasses national and international law governing activities in outer space.
_	Cole authored the law that created the Mayaguez Zoo (first and only zoo in Puerto Rico and the Caribbean) when he was a legislator.
_	Law 25-91 established that the number of members of the court would be 11 judges, but later the law that sets the number 156-97 in 16 judges, including the Chief Justice was enacted.
_	Among his major achievements was the law that required banks to promptly credit their customers with checks when deposited instead of holding the amounts for days while using the money for their own profit, the first such law in the country.
_	""The American people want the mob and its associates brought to justice and their power broken—not out of a sense of vengeance, but out of a sense of justice; not just from an obligation to punish the guilty but from an even stronger obligation to protect the innocent; not simply for the sake of legalities but for the sake of the law that is the protection of liberty.""
_	For over a decade, the law that was meant to foster temperance instead fostered intemperance and excess.
_	In the Court of Appeal for Ontario decision [1970] 2 O.R. 487, 11 D.L.R. (3d) 277, Arthur Jessup J. wrote for the court: "So, despite the moral outrage of the text writers, it appears presently the law that one can, with immunity, smoke a cigarette on the beach while one’s neighbour drowns and, without a word of warning watch a child or blind person walk into certain danger".
_	With the approval of the law that transformed the agrotechniques in the Federal Institutes, the municipality was contemplated with a campus.
_	In addition, diluted property rights are not extended to incidental violation of the law that reaves a rightful owner of his rights.
_	and Christ tells the doctor of the law that we must love God with our whole mind, our whole strength (Luke 10:27).
_	On May 13, 1888, Princess Isabel, acting in place of her ailing father Pedro II, signed the law that abolished slavery in Brazil, granting no compensation to slave owners.
_	Note that just because a portion of a state's law is found to be unconstitutional does not mean that the entire law will be deemed unconstitutional: "[I]nvalidating the statute entirely is not always necessary or justified, for lower courts may be able to render narrower declaratory and injunctive relief," meaning the court could declare that only those parts of the law that are violative of the Constitution are invalid (declaratory relief), or that the court can prohibit the state from enforcing those portions of the law (injunctive relief).
_	A coalition of 1,500 leading industrialists of Argentina refused to pay into a state-run pension fund following a general strike and labor lockout organized to fight the law that established the fund.
_	An appellate court examines the record of evidence presented in the trial court and the law that the lower court applied and decides whether the decision was legally sound or not.
_	Voters were asked whether they were in favor of the amendments to the law that were passed in January 2014.
_	The senators of the 10th Congress of the Philippines credited him for the passing of Republic Act 3018 which nationalized the rice and corn industry and the law that is responsible for the foundation of the Veterans Bank.
_	It provides that, if the law has changed after an offense was committed, the version of the law that applies is the one that is more advantageous for the accused.
_	On November 5, 1999, a Quebec judge ruled that the Onex takeover was illegal, breaking the law that stipulates that no more than 10 percent of the company can be controlled by a single shareholder.
_	He also reports that bank executives and former politicians and regulators, like Robert Rubin, Lawrence Summers and Timothy Geithner, were the ones who profited financially from this, after changes in the law that allowed commercial banks to get into investment banking, hence the merger of Citicorp and Travelers Group.
_	More specifically, the bill seeks to bring Montana in line with the Supreme Court ruling that "the law that criminalizes homosexual acts is unconstitutional."
_	A referendum on repealing the law that abolished the petroleum monopoly held by ANCAP was held in Uruguay on 7 December 2003.
_	In relation to a gang war in Denmark, non-ethnic Danish gangs criticised the government due to the law that criminals of non-Danish citizenship are deported.
_	Aspects of the law that affect people in everyday situations, such as law on marriages, law on loans and mortgages, labour law and human rights law, are taught and discussed at their training sessions.
_	While it was not the law that electors had to take such a pledge, the executive committees of the political parties had the statutory right to set the criteria for determining who would be certified as electors in their primaries.
_	Fitzgerald examined the pith and substance of the law that delegated the power to the commission.
_	Ben later approaches officials and notifies them that it is the law that they re-count, since it was so close.
_	He who supports the law that requires others to fight, morally and legally fights himself."
_	What this question points out to us is that acts do not, in themselves, possess 'criminal qualities', that is, there is nothing inherent that makes any act a crime other than that it has been designated a crime in the law that has jurisdiction in that time and place.
_	The Supreme Court, however, ruled in 2004 that the sections of the law that permit monitoring violated the constitution.
_	Convinced then, from so many years of impunity, that in the event of judicial troubles, at most they could forbid him to leave Bardonecchia, the law that established the obligatory stay, in the place of residence.
_	The effect of our criminal law upon the character of those who have paid the penalty is so exactly opposite from that designed by the law that ex-convicts are always under police espionage and are objects of suspicion immediately upon the commission of every new crime.
_	Perzel supported the 2003 tax increase proposed by Rendell as well as Act 71, the law that legalized slot machine gambling in Pennsylvania.
_	On 16 September 2015 the Ukrainian parliament voted for the law that sets 20 February 2014 as the official date of the Russian temporary occupation of Crimean peninsula.
_	A line from the law that was especially stood out was that “[o]fficers of government are trustees and servants of the people and it is in the public interest to enable any person to review and criticize their decisions even though such examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment”.
_	During his term in Congress, he chaired the Philippine Assembly's Committee on Women's Suffrage and was instrumental in the passage of the law that gave women the right to vote.
_	Smoking while driving is considered one of the major causes of accidents, so that the General Traffic Department is considering enforcing the law that bans motorists smoking inside their vehicles while driving.
_	Even though SR 124 was established in 1964, no signs went up until the law that made SR 124 was approved by the Washington State Legislature in 1970.
_	The "Broadcasting Act 2009" sets out the details of the law that applies to the corporation, including the duties and functions of the board, as well as that of the chairperson of the board and the director general.
_	The Clean Air Act is the law that defines EPA's responsibilities for protecting and improving the national air quality.
_	The DeArmond Family, along with the help of State Rep. Alvin Ellis Jr., found a loophole in the law that allowed sports pools, which led to the fund raising system and the use of betting cards.
_	The Savoy Operas by Gilbert and Sullivan frequently feature quibbles; W. S. Gilbert had read law and had practised briefly as a barrister, and regarded the minor technicalities of the law that typically gave rise to quibbles to be highly characteristic of the legalistic Victorian British society satirized in his works.
_	Though the Separation Edict was widely considered to be the law that first established the rigid class system of the subsequent Tokugawa shogunate based on the four occupations, Japanese historian Shosaku Takagi has called this into question.
_	Also in February 2017, Baker launched a search for a new permanent MBTA general manager and recommended that the Fiscal and Management Control Board exercise the two-year extension option to continue its governance of the MBTA allowed under the law that authorized its formation, which was formally granted the following May.
_	The committee pointed out the provision in the law that stipulates that its full implementation should only come after a six-month aggressive information campaign.
_	Although the theory has some interest, it is limited in its application to the criminal law because it is not so much the law that represents sectional interests, but the way in which it is enforced.
_	The law that relates to civil wrongs is part of the branch of the law that is called the civil law.
_	She was in favor of an amendment to the law that would exclude rapists.
_	Pub landlords had raised concerns prior to the implementation of the law that a smoking ban would have a negative impact on sales.
_	Talmudic law is the law that is derived from the Talmud based on the teachings of the Talmudic Sages.
_	Pro-choice groups against the legislation say that there are several aspects of the law that are not constitutional.
_	The Federal Police was created as the main Federal Preventive Police in 1999 by the initiative of President Ernesto Zedillo (1994–2000) to prevent and combat and to enforce the law that drugs will not run around on Mexico's streets.
_	“If there is any article in the law that is not in keeping with the Afghan constitution...it should be corrected in consultation with our clergy, in accordance to the constitution and our Islamic Shariah.”
_	As such, they could not exercise the federal judicial power, and therefore the law that placed admiralty cases in their jurisdiction was unconstitutional.
_	Each fought for their own survival until the RLIF laid down the law that saw the NRL effectively shut down and its clubs moved to the SARL.
_	Federal Parliament has power to elect President and Vice-President of the Federation, make a request to the Constitutional Court for dismissal of President and Vice-President, ratification of the Federal Government by majority of votes, enacting laws to exercise responsibilities allocate to the Federation Government, which shall take effect as specified therein but no sooner than when promulgated in the Official Journal, authorizing any use of military force by the Federation, which must be in accordance with international law, granting the cantons the authority to sign the agreements with the states and international organizations, with the agreement of the BiH Assembly, except of the agreements for which the BiH Assembly decides by the law that they do n to need such an agreement, approval, by the majority of votes, of the agreements with the states and international organizations, with the agreements of the BiH Assembly, except of the agreements for which the BiH Assembly decides by the law that they do not need such an agreement, financing the armed forces of the Federation and approving nominations of officers, adopting the budget of the Federation and enacting legislation to levy taxes and otherwise secure the necessary financing and performing such other responsibilities as are conferred upon it, and Chairman of the House of Representatives shall serve as Vice-President, for the necessary period.
_	Iura novit curia is a Latin legal maxim expressing the principle that "the court knows the law", i.e., that the parties to a legal dispute do not need to plead or prove the law that applies to their case.
_	Over the sixteenth century, the Stannary Convocation met several times and expanded the legal code of stannary law in a number of notable ways, demonstrating a legal capacity to legislate regarding the law that bound tinners.
_	With the accession of the United Kingdom to the European Community, the trust entered Community Law; the law of the member state where the trust is constituted (the "situs") is designated as the applicable law (the law that must be followed) in member states.
_	The Council and General Assembly of the colony formally read into the meeting minutes the Declaration of Independence created across the Delaware River in Philadelphia in the previous year and enacted the law that formally accepted its terms.
_	According to an American whaler at the time, the law that accompanied settlement in their region could be summed up as 'a word and a blow: the blow, which is generally fatal, coming first'.
_	It was passed by parliament on 7 November 2013, and replaced the Grameen Bank Ordinance, the law that underpinned the creation of Grameen Bank as a specialised microcredit institution in 1983.
_	As a senator, he introduced the law that first created an unofficial Guam delegate to the U.S. Congress.
_	She is mostly known for having pushed the popular 35-hour workweek law, known as the "Loi Aubry", reducing the nominal length of the normal full-time working week from 39 to 35 hours, and the law that created Couverture maladie universelle (Universal health care coverage).
_	She testified before the state legislature in an effort to change the law that made the use of contraceptives illegal.
_	It is the intent of the law that their actions be taken openly and that their deliberations be conducted openly.
_	Other problems with the judicial system include a lack of training among the judiciary and provisions of the law that allow individual judges to consult principles of Shari'a in situations that are not covered by the Mudawana.
_	The squatters who wished to take from Sutter's land worked to find loopholes in the law that would allow them to claim the land as public and render his, and those of the speculators that bought land from him, invalid.
_	It must then determine whether or not the law that has been challenged or the conduct of the respondent impairs that interest, thereby trespassing in an area protected by the Bill of Rights.
_	Although the law that decreed the creation of HealthCare.gov has been divisive and political speculation has taken place, polling done by the Gallup organization around the time of the difficult roll-out still have found that a majority of Americans support keeping at least some aspects of Obamacare.
_	Articles regarding the Sports relations (in the national and international level), and the sports organizations (their legal status and the law that governs their function), are also published.
_	The Windrush generation will not get justice until it is the law that is changed, not just the home secretary."
_	After several months of discussion, the then prime minister of Spain, Adolfo Suárez and the leader of the opposition, Felipe González, reached an agreement to resolve the Andalusian issue, whereby the Parliament approved an amendment to the law that regulated referendums, and used a prerogative of article 144c of the constitution, both actions which combined would allow Andalusia to take the fast route.
_	The is the law that governs electrical appliance safety in Japan.
_	According to the law that is still current, one prostitute may work from an indoor premises, but if there are two or more prostitutes the place is considered a brothel and it is an offence.
_	As 2.57 = 43.5, it follows from the law that the temperature of the Sun is 2.57 times greater than the temperature of the lamella, so Stefan got a value of 5430 °C or 5700 K (the modern value is 5778 K).
_	The Appellate court ruled that Judge John F. Keenan had erred at trial in denying Banki's defense's request to instruct the jury on the law that specifically exempts family money as an exception to the sanctions law, permitting such transfers without the need for a license:
_	He sponsored the law that created the KCHIP Program to provide health care coverage for more of Kentucky's uninsured children and expanded Medicaid coverage for children.
_	This, however, was against the law that established the institution.
_	Now this was very alarming to the church and also to those who had not been persuaded by Amlici, because they knew according to the law that these things must be established by the voice of the people.
_	In 1990, Moynihan sponsored the law that renamed the building after Alexander Hamilton, the first Secretary of the Treasury.
_	Some historians profess that the law that neither widow, nor maiden was forced to marry a man that she disliked as being a sign of equality; however, Aethelberht's law contradicts this in as much as a man is legally allowed to steal another man's wife as long as he pays him reparation.
_	The part of the law that defines its authority and scope is known as Regulation B, from the (b) that appears in Title 12 part 1002's official identifier: 12 C.F.R. § 1002.1(b) (2017).
_	A 2009 reform, effective on 1 March 2010, enables parties to a lawsuit or trial to question the constitutionality of the law that is being applied to them.
_	This is the law that made GHB a schedule 1 controlled substance.
_	It is necessary to indicate that in Spanish law, involuntary homicide is not regulated; in the majority of cases the law that will be applied will be somewhere between homicide and the criminal concept which is involved.
_	The Radical Civic Union (UCR) considers the commercial a violation of the law that regulates the political campaign.
_	A short-lived American invention developed in the 1980s, the Sputter Gun was designed to circumvent the law that defined a machine gun as something that fired multiple rounds with one pull of the trigger.
_	Bresch testified before the U.S. Senate Special Committee on Aging to lobby for changes to the law that would prevent pharmaceutical companies from raising challenges to the introduction of generic competitors by filing citizen's petitions with the FDA, and that would prevent pharma companies from undercutting the profits of generic drug companies by making deals for authorized generics to be introduced.
_	It is stated in the law that the Dharma Star is of a lower rank than the Bintang Sakti and can be given many times for different services and devotions.
_	Instead, Livingstone got on board with a campaign known as "Keep Fares Fair" in order to bring about a change in the law that would make the Fares Fair policy legal; an alternate movement, "Can't Pay, Won't Pay", accused Livingstone of being a sell-out and insisted that the GLC proceed with its policies regardless of their legality.
_	There are no provisions in the law that public notice must be provided to neighboring property owners when a claim is filed.
_	Credit unions, with the support of Republicans have successfully lobbied to exempt themselves from the (U.S. federal) Community Reinvestment Act, the law that forces banks to provide services in low-income areas.
_	Rachel Adler suggests that halakha itself is too central to Judaism, that a perpetual cycle where men create the language and the law that all are expected to follow is detrimental to the future of Judaism, but that it is still necessary to the essence of Judaism.
_	Though the actual reapportionment will normally occur in respect of a decennial census, the law that governs the total number of representatives and the method of apportionment to be carried into force at that time can be created prior to the census.
_	Those new acts contained changes to the law that were deemed appropriate.
_	After the Curiate Assembly elected the new king, and the Senate ratified that election, the interrex then presided over the assembly as it voted on the law that granted the king his legal powers (the "lex curiata de imperio").
_	One of his most important discoveries was the law that now bears his name.
_	He argued that the federal government was not empowered by the Constitution to create slavery anywhere and that when an enslaved person leaves the jurisdiction of a state where slavery is legal, he ceases to be a slave; he continues to be a man and leaves behind the law that made him a slave.
_	His reports to President Herbert Hoover were the basis for amendments to the law that extended judicial control of the over bankruptcy proceedings and speeded up the resolution of some cases.
_	Some vestiges of the old regime remained codified as well, such as the law that Hutu military officials were not allowed to marry Tutsi women.
_	In the latter position, he was responsible for drafting the law that barred the Church from holding landed property.
_	However, if the provisional measure adopted by the president is approved by Congress without changes, the bill does not need to be presented for approval or veto; in that case, the law that both corresponds fully to the provisional measure and replaces it is promulgated directly by the President of the Senate, with the following words:
_	The substantive law of the 1866 "Civil Code of Lower Canada" was derived primarily from the judicial interpretations of the law that had been in force to that date in Lower Canada.
_	In those days the punishment for forgery was hanging by the Forgery Act, 1728 passed by the British Parliament in England (United Kingdom), but the law was construed for the people committing forgery in England due to the then prevailing conditions in England and there was no provision in the law that it is applicable in India too.
_	Takahashi referred to the law that he preached, and practiced, as "shoubou" (proper Buddhist law).
_	The laws and precedence of the Irish Republic were taken from the law that existed in Ireland on the day Dáil Éireann first sat (21 January 1919), with the addition of all Dáil decrees issued from that date.
_	Although the law that German citizenship passed only through fathers was changed in 1953, this was not made retroactive.
_	Münzer was generally apolitical, but politics began to catch up with him in 1933 in the form of the law that sought to dismiss Communists, non-Aryans, and opponents of the Nazi Party.
_	However, it was not until the final day of debate on the law that the workings of the system chosen were agreed upon.
_	During their term of office, Papius and Poppaeus authored the law that bore their names.
_	The Ministry of Justice (MOJ) maintained that the courts had established legal precedents for strict interpretation of the law that preclude arbitrary application.
_	Taft was assigned to cover the local courts, and also spent time reading law in his father's office; both activities gave him practical knowledge of the law that was not taught in class.
_	This was clearly stated in the law that authorizes GSEs, on the securities themselves, and in many public communications issued by Fannie Mae.
_	Employer opposition to employer sanctions began to subside, partly because of the "affirmative defense" clause in the law that explicitly released employers from any obligation to check the authenticity of workers' documents.
_	United Kingdom immigration law is the law that relates to who may enter, work in and remain in the United Kingdom.
_	In early August 2016 the Uruguayan supreme court issued a ruling in favor of cable TV company Monte Cablevideo S.A., declaring unconstitutional the law that made it unlawful for cable TV companies to offer Internet service.
_	He later co-sponsored the law that bars insurance companies based in Maryland from using pre-existing conditions to deny coverage.
_	As President of the Board of Examiners Scott considered that it was more from the desire of a Government job than love of the law that drove the students to work hard at their studies.
_	In November of that year, FIESP also filed an unconstitutionality lawsuit against the law that approved an increase in the Urban Land and Building Tax (IPTU), with an average of 55% for households and 88% for businesses in the city of São Paulo.
_	Nor can the law that existed before the new law be used to qualify or modify the approved Act.
_	However, there appears to be a marital exception in the law that allows a minor over 15 to consent to sex with an adult if the minor is married to the adult.
_	He then added a provision to the law that the senate should issue a preliminary decree on these matters and that the decree had to be ratified by the people.
_	Judge Nazih Tangho of the High Administrative Court referred the case to the Constitutional Court to look into the law that gave the constitutional panel legal immunity, a clause he said needed vetting because no one should be above legal supervision.
_	Muslim Brotherhood lawyer Abdel Moneim Abdel Maqsoud stated that the Supreme Constitutional Court needed at least two months to rule on the case, citing the law that obliged it to consider the cases 45 days after its referral.
_	In a 5-4 ruling, the court struck down the part of the law that provided escalating matching funds.
_	In terms of the law that establishes the Pan South African Language Board (Act 59 of 1995), the board may establish language bodies to advise it on "any particular language, sign language or augmentative and alternative communication".
_	Its decentralised nature makes it similar to the law that prevails in preliterate tribal societies.
_	Boyce v R is a 2004 Judicial Committee of the Privy Council (JCPC) case which upheld the law that sets out a mandatory sentence of death for murder in Barbados.
_	It proposes changes to the law that will make the law simpler, more accessible, fairer, modern and more cost-effective.
_	Stating that "our culture of censorship has evolved into a culture of self-censorship," he admitted that although he "openly condemn[ed] and challenge[d] the law that has shut the ears and eyes of the Thai public, I also cooperate, doing my part by not speaking and not writing as frankly as I would love to."
_	In spite of their support in the parliament, the BDP was critical of the provision in the law that the defendants will pay for the translation fees and that the law applies only to spoken defense in court but not to a written defense or the pre-trial investigation.
_	The College was found guilty of eleven violations of the law that governs gender equality, and agreed to make several changes to its athletic programs.
_	Eventually members of the Oregon State Dental Association sued the Oregon State Board of Higher Education for a declaratory judgment on the interpretation of the law that created the merger.
_	The latter opposed the law that barred holders of church offices from also holding political appointments in Venice.
_	The Act disestablished the (Anglican) Church of Ireland, a body that commanded the adherence of a small minority of the population of Ireland, disassociating it from the state and repealing the law that required tithes to be paid to it.
_	North Carolina General Statute Chapter 108A is the law that implemented Title XIX in North Carolina...on January 1, 1970.
_	Measure B, also known as the "County of Los Angeles Safer Sex In the Adult Film Industry Act," is the law that requires the use of condoms in all vaginal and anal sex scenes in pornography productions filmed in Los Angeles County, California.
_	Divine help comes in Christ through the law that guides and the grace that sustains, by which souls work out their "own salvation with fear and trembling."
_	As CEETEPS was not an educational institution, but the maintainer of two academic units, the law that created the UNESP established that CEETEPS will integrate the new university in the condition of special institution, linked and associated with it.
_	The insertion of this new language was described by the manager of the House bill, Representative John Conyers, as "clarifying" in nature because it simply made explicit in the law that which was previously described in the Senate Committee Report as implicit and intended.
_	He shared the widespread hope that the fascists would become a more moderate and responsible party upon taking power, but withdrew his support in 1924, voting against the law that restricted press freedom.
_	Glanville was elected President of the ICE in November 1950 and such was his popularity in that office that there was a movement amongst members to waive the law that limits presidents to one term that had long been in the statute books.
_	It allows the court to review error of fact or a retroactive change in the law that which affects the validity of the prior proceeding.
_	RAI censors felt that the song, which was titled "Sì" ("Yes"), and which contained lyrics constantly repeating the aforementioned word could be accused of being subliminal messaging and a form of propaganda to influence the Italian voting public to vote 'yes' in the referendum ('yes' to repeal the law that allowed divorce).
_	The movie exemplifies the troubles that the LGBTQ community in India has to face due to the existence of S377, which is the law that criminalizes homosexuality.
_	The National Biodefense Strategy Act amends the Homeland Security Act of 2002 (the law that created the U.S. Department of Homeland Security one year after the 9/11 attacks) by directing the President of the United States to:
_	On 12 August the Gaddafi regime announced that "any citizen in possession of a Thuraya [satellite telephone] must hold an authorisation to use it in accordance with the laws and regulations" and otherwise would "be punished according to the law that criminalizes communicating with the enemy in time of war, and stipulates penalties up to the death penalty".
_	Still others are notable for being written with such a clear and concise explanation of the states of the law that they are used by multiple law school casebooks to teach the area of law addressed.
_	The Civil Code is in essence a body of rules and regulations that, in all matters treated by or in the spirit or vein of its provisions, sets forth the "jus commune", or the law that applies to all of Quebec, either in express or implied terms.
_	The Jerusalem Talmud answered that he saw the incident and remembered the law that zealots may beat up one who has sexual relations with an Aramean woman.
_	He was an indefatigable writer to the Editor of "The Times", usually on anomalies in the law that had been overlooked.
_	He instructed them, "Where the woman charged to have been raped is white, there is a strong presumption under the law that she will not and did not yield voluntarily to intercourse with the defendant, a Negro."
_	Fairy Rosebud enters the Abode of Demon Alcohol, who complains bitterly about the law that requires demons to speak in verse; and indeed he is very bad at it.
_	The Traffic Signs Regulations and General Directions (commonly abbreviated to TSRGD) is the law that sets out the design and conditions of use of official traffic signs that can be lawfully placed on or near roads in Great Britain (England, Scotland and Wales) and the Isle of Man.
_	He returned in 2009 to the previous team Sacilese in Lega Pro Seconda Divisione (previous name Serie C2) but didn't made any appearances for entire 2009–10 season due the law that prohibits the enrollment of non-EU citizens.
_	Warfare ended when Charles V relented in the Peace of Passau (1552) and in the Peace of Augsburg (1555), which formalized the law that the rulers of a land decide its religion.
_	In Joshua quoted to the Reubenites, Gadites, and Manassites, cautioning them to take diligent heed to do the commandment and the law that Moses the servant of the Lord commanded.
_	It is the law that binds them together, giving them responsibilities (munera) on the one hand and rights of citizenship on the other.
_	In 1938, under the direction of Louis Simon, Supervising Architect of the Treasury, the building was expanded to allow sessions of the United States District Court for the Western District of New York to be held in the city, as authorized by the law that had created the district in 1900.
_	This law was challenged by the reformists, and their 2006 election campaign included changing this law to allow non-clerics into the assembly, and reforming the law that allows Guardian Council to vet candidates.
_	Section 3 of the law covers the fundamental policies of the law that include providing education for students with disabilities; providing education relevant to the lives of the students; and granting autonomy of colleges and universities.
_	He is also one of the principal authors of Republic Act 9576, of the law that doubles the maximum deposit insurance coverage by the Philippine Deposit Insurance Corporation from P250,000 to P500,000.
_	1887: The Supreme Court strikes down the law that enfranchised women in the Washington territory.
_	Due to the high time cost (wait times at Swedish Tax Agency offices can range from 15 minutes to several hours) and high volume, universities were generally unable to assist, despite the technical allowance in the law that allows an "international advisor at a state university" to attest for a student.
_	Due to public concern, the provision to pay physicians for providing voluntary counseling was removed from the Senate bill and was not included in the law that was enacted, the 2010 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.
_	Although prosecutors did not charge Somdet, the incident postponed his appointment and led to a change in the law that allowed the Thai government to bypass the Sangha Supreme Council and appoint the supreme patriarch directly.
_	In 1965, he signed the law that created the New York City Landmarks Preservation Commission.
_	The coach had been on duty for sixteen hours when the collision happened, contravening the law that one cannot drive if they have been working more than fourteen consecutive hours.
_	It is highly regrettable that Dominic Grieve has sought, as did the coroner Nicholas Gardiner before him, to rubber-stamp the clear subversion of due process of the law that the derailing of the inquest by Lord Falconer on August 13, 2003 constituted."
_	After two years fighting, was enacted in 2013 the law that deprives taxation of social security contributions of employers in certain sectors, calculated over the payroll, which creates less pressure on the costs of those who produce and more Jobs for those who work.
_	After winning, he said he would accept the result but would attempt to change the law that governs election ties.
_	For instance when groups in Cameroon asked Human Rights Watch to research the effects of the law that criminalizes homosexual conduct in that country.
_	In 1992, Sevilla became a Sporting Limited Association, following the entry into force of the law that regulated them and therefore the system of election of the president was amended from being elected by the members to be elected by the shareholders of the club.
_	Positive law is also described as the law that applies at a certain time (present or past) and at a certain place, consisting of statutory law, and case law as far as it is binding.
_	Gordon pulled a gun and prepared to shoot him, but Batman explained that they were two of a kind, and that he was able to bend the law that Gordon couldn't in order to achieve justice.
_	This is because of a loophole in the law that allows a gaming license to be renewed so long as a casino is on the property and open to the public for at least eight hours every two years.
_	Lambda Legal pursues litigation in all parts of the country, in every area of the law that affects communities they represent, such as discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodations, and the military; HIV/AIDS-related discrimination and public policy issues; parenting and relationship issues; equal marriage rights; equal employment and domestic partnership benefits; "sodomy" law challenges; immigration issues; anti-gay initiatives; and free speech and equal protection rights.
_	In 1941, the Solicitor General noted that Congress had approved the law that enabled tribes to reconstitute their governments and, by extension, enabled them to create new constitutions and rules.
_	The Conservancy came up with a unique and innovative proposal for meeting the requirements of the law that stated revenues were to be used for public preservation purposes.
_	The South Carolina Statehouse was prepared to consider changes to the law that would place the ability with City Council instead.
_	Textualism is often erroneously conflated with originalism, and was advocated by United States Supreme Court Justices such as Hugo Black and Antonin Scalia; the latter staked out his claim in his 1997 Tanner Lecture: "[it] is the law that governs, not the intent of the lawgiver."
_	The British newspaper "The Guardian" commented on the law that it is "not about children's rights" and "ruins lives and leaves both countries looking sordid."
_	On 11 May 2017, the president of Brazil, Michel Temer, sanctioned the law that creates the National Civil Identification (NCI).
_	The authors find numerous instances of vestigial references to human sacrifice, most notably the law that all firstborns must be "consecrated" or "given" to Yahweh (Exodus 13:2, 22:28).
_	That is the law that says no actor is in a movie unless his character is necessary."
_	Um, the prosecution gave his... kind of narrow definition during the, the closing arguments, but there was nothing in the law that really backed that up."
_	This group is distinguished from other health care efforts because the law that created it requires the President to respond to the recommendations, and requires the following five Congressional committees to hold hearings on them:
_	In 2010, Squadron sponsored the law that brought billions in federal dollars to New York City's public housing.
_	In the anime, when he tries to change the law that decrees women cannot inherit the throne, Duke Duralumin's men kidnap and imprison him, then fake his death, leaving the kingdom believe he fell off a cliff and drowned.
_	The claim is only a partial claim since the law that allows the Philippines to expand its territorial boundaries also includes islands in the South China Sea.
_	It served as an addition to the law that was signed by the president in August 2016.
_	The first piece of legislation he co-sponsored was the law that changed the name of FTU, his alma mater, to the University of Central Florida.
_	He was the prime sponsor of the law that created the "Florida Prepaid College Tuition Program", the first and largest of its kind in the United States.
_	The law of averages is the law that a particular outcome or event is inevitable or certain simply because it is statistically possible.
_	This is against the law that sets the maximum interest rate at 20%.
_	Harper's administration was seeking to change the law that would make it illegal to wear a face covering during the citizenship ceremony.
_	They made the law that any inmates serving more than two years in prison cannot vote.
_	He stated in the law that people cannot increase the rent more than 10% every year and made Rent Contract in houses obligatory with the objective of protecting the renter.
_	Rabbi Jose the Galilean taught that the "certain men who were unclean by the dead body of a man, so that they could not keep the Passover on that day" in were those who bore Joseph's coffin, as implied in and The Gemara cited their doing so to support the law that one who is engaged on one religious duty is free from any other.
_	Other laws Howard has worked on through the Children's Advocacy Institute include the law that permits more than two parents to be legally recognized as parents and AB 2632 (Maienschein) (2014) that requires criminal record clearances in community care facilities.
_	The school holds several summer programs in the law that are open to students from other schools, including: the China Intellectual Property Summer Institute in cooperation with Tsinghua University Law School in Beijing; the eLaw Summer Institute in collaboration with the University College Cork Faculty of Law in Cork, Ireland; the Intellectual Property Summer Institute, hosted at New Hampshire Law's main campus; and the Advanced Topics in International Criminal Law and Justice Seminar in Washington, D.C.
_	In 2016, Alaska chose not to participate in the law that doesn't allow people with a felony drug conviction to apply for programs to assist in their living and family situations.
_	Salisbury City Schools brgan as a separate system on March 3, 1921, when the North Carolina General Assembly adopted the law that allowed a separate Board of Education to run the system.
_	In 2010, Elias sought advisory opinions from the Federal Election Commission declaring that certain Google and Facebook advertisements were covered by the "small items" and "impracticable" exemptions of the law that otherwise requires a political advertisement to include a disclaimer revealing who paid for it.
_	De Friese Meren is the name specified for the municipality in the law that establishes it.
_	In 1999, Blakeman sponsored the "Consumers Insurance Company Act", a private bill designed to create a new insurance company, in compliance with the law that new insurance companies could only be created by acts of the legislature.
_	During his tenure he created the law that forced civil servants to make a sworn statement of goods.
_	He wrote the law that reformed the county’s public records process to ensure that citizens can easily obtain records and monitor their government.
_	The human figure conforms very well to the law that states that form follows function, which is a result of evolution over thousands of generations.
_	Venezuela had inherited from Spain the law that the ground surface—presumably, as deep as a plow or a water well went—could belong to individuals but everything under the soil was state property.
_	They had threatened to force Ferrill from the state, using the law that required free blacks from other states to leave Kentucky after 90 days.
_	Exceptions within the law that allow lawsuits to go forward fall under "negligent entrustment" and "predicate exception" actions, which target negligent retailers or manufacturers who violated local statutes applicable to the sale of firearms, but these cases are difficult to prove and rarely clear the PLCAA threshold in court.
_	However, during the spell, Tas interrupts and goes back with them, defying the law that kender, dwarves, and gnomes cannot go back in time for fear of disrupting and changing it.
_	His assistant (dewan) and a pandit then found the law that was applicable to the case.
_	The Chinese government provided no explanation for the move, though officials had previously accused Chan of unspecified violations of the law that were never clarified.
_	Part of the Quran, the Islamic religious book, includes understanding and respecting the law that any animal products should not be eaten if the animal has not been slaughtered properly, making the animal or animal-product "maytah".
_	When he was tried for high treason, the judges were empowered to demote his other ranks and titles, but due to the principle of separation of powers, the judges had no authority to cancel the law that had made Pétain a Marshal and it remained the only title he kept after being sentenced.
_	The Relief faction then introduced legislation to repeal the law that originally created the Court of Appeals, then replace the abolished court with a new court.
_	For example, the law that "forbid brothel keepers [from] beat[ing] them."
_	In 1986, he sponsored the law that made it possible to use credit cards at liquor stores in the State of New York.
_	It is often described as the law that keeps citizens in the know about their government.
_	Before 1915, the law that regulated the width of county roads changed frequently, at times imposing a maximum width of .
_	REACH can pass over the law that prohibits animal testing of ingredients and finished cosmetic products from 2013.
_	Other legal technicalities deal with aspects of substantive law, that is, aspects of the law that articulate specific criteria that a court uses to assess a party's compliance with or violation of, for example, one or more criminal laws or civil laws.
_	The group calls for a change in the law that would allow terminally ill, mentally competent adults the choice of an assisted death.
_	Nevertheless, such unions are not recognised under Thai law in accordance with the law that states "A man or a woman cannot marry each other while one of them has a spouse."
_	Partnering with breast cancer advocacy organizations, he wrote the law that requires New York State to match donations made to the state's Breast Cancer Research and Education Fund listed on state income tax return forms.
_	The specific section of the law that dictated sentencing for violators stated:
_	However, in the same year, Misuari again make a controversial proposal by calling the government to include the extreme terrorist-group Abu Sayyaf in Moro peace talks that was responded with a rejection by the Philippine government and the country armed forces as the group have committed "too many murders to innocent civilians", Duterte also citing the Abu Sayyaf group has been repeatedly called before to stop their terrorist activities, but the group continue to do so and obeying the law that push the need for the group to be destroyed.
_	During this period, Indira Gandhi's Congress (R) used its parliamentary majority to amend the Indian Constitution and overwrite the law that she had been found guilty of violating.
_	An article in "Think Progress" speculated that he could be imprisoned under provisions of the law that "A person who aids, abets, counsels or procures another to engage in acts of homosexuality commits an offence and is liable, conviction, to imprisonment for seven years."
_	The Mental health Act 2001 is the law that must be followed when giving care and treatment to people with mental illness.
_	A party who is directly affected by the law that purports to be unconstitutional has standing as of right.
_	In 1970 he argued the case of "Gillette v. United States" before the United States Supreme Court, challenging the constitutionality of the law that limited conscientious objector status to men who objected to war in general.
_	Brazilian Civil Rights Framework for the Internet (in Portuguese: Marco Civil da Internet, officially Law No 12.965) is the law that governs the use of the Internet in Brazil, through forecasting principles, guarantees, rights and duties to those who use the network as well as the determination of guidelines for state action.
_	The court also struck down the portion of the law that requires all firearms including rifles and shotguns be kept "unloaded and disassembled or bound by a trigger lock."
_	The United States Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), the law that gives United States EPA its authority to regulate pesticides, includes certain synergists in its definition of a “pesticide” and is thus subject to the same approval and registration as products that kill pests, like the insecticides with which PBO is formulated.
_	IBO sued for access to the city’s data along with 16 other co-plaintiffs, claiming the mayor had broken the law that required him to provide the information necessary for IBO to effectively monitor New York City’s finances by instead choosing to funnel all requests for city information to the mayor’s Office of Management and Budget.
_	Arth asserts that legalization would reverse the popular contempt for the law that results from prohibition; eliminate the 800,000 American gang members and global drug cartels; and reduce the incarceration rate in the U.S., which is now seven times higher than Canada.
_	She opposed the law that only girls from the Swedish speaking upper classes were accepted at the state girl schools, a restriction which was lifted in 1872; she also spoke in favor of illegitimate girls be allowed; and that the Finnish language, which was the language of the poor classes in Finland but unknown by upper and- middle class women, should be taught to educated women in Finland.
_	The "global license" was thus removed from the text, and did not make it into the final version of the law that was put into place.
_	The Payment Systems and Netting Act 1998 gives the board power in areas of the law that were previously uncertain.
_	He had done this without carefully observing the law that provided for no slaughter unless first examined by a qualified veterinary surgeon and pronounced to be infected with rinderpest.
_	In spite of their support in the parliament, the BDP was critical of the provision in the law that the defendants will pay for the translation fees and that the law applies only to spoken defense in court but not to a written defense or the pre-trial investigation.
_	Matthew v S is a 2004 Judicial Committee of the Privy Council (JCPC) case which upheld the law that sets out a mandatory sentence of death for murder in Trinidad and Tobago.
_	The Cato Institute reacted by calling the program a tax but blamed the GOP Congress in 1996 for passage of Commodity Promotion, Research and Information Act of 1996, the law that authorized such checkoff programs.
_	The Mishnah tractate Megillah mentions the law that a town can only be called a "city" if it supports ten men ("batlanim") to make up the required quorum for communal prayers.
_	He would ask Muslims seeking the conversion of Christian minors to abide by the law that prohibits conversions of minors and would seek the support of higher authorities if lower government authorities were not implementing the law.
_	He emphasized that a sovereign is bound to observe certain basic rules derived from the divine law, the law of nature or reason, and the law that is common to all nations (jus gentium), as well as the fundamental laws of the state that determine who is the sovereign, who succeeds to sovereignty, and what limits the sovereign power.
_	Justice Brown began by noting the basic principle of the law that "every person has a right to complete immunity of his person from physical interference of others, except in so far as contact may be necessary under the general doctrine of privilege; and any unauthorized touching of the person of another, except it be in the spirit of pleasantry, constitutes an assault and battery."
_	As a legislator, Landrieu sponsored a bill to repeal the law that allowed the tax to exist.
_	This legislation actually dated back to 1886, and it was claimed in the law that the real purpose was to target a product that was "injurious to health."
_	The second of these essays ("De la nature de l'air") contains the statement of the law that the volume of a gas varies inversely as the pressure, which, though very generally called by the name of Mariotte, had been discovered in 1662 by Robert Boyle.
_	The President invoked the law that striking government employees forfeit their jobs, an action that unsettled those who cynically believed no President would ever uphold that law.
_	The manuscript contains a copy of some of the law that applied in medieval Wales, known as "Cyfraith Hywel" (the law of Hywel, after the Welsh king Hywel Dda).
_	Some aspects of the law that the staff thought would be repealed were the marriage of girls as young as nine years old to men and that wives did not need the man's permission to work.
_	Marzilli wrote the law that expanded the earned income tax credit benefiting low wage workers.
_	Slavery ended because slaves no longer wanted to be slaves, because slaves rebelled against their masters and against the law that enslaved them ...
_	During his legislative career, he originated the law that put an end to the local slave trade in 1819, the one that established the school fund, and the provisions of a law that regulated the partition of real estate in New Jersey and the rights of aliens to possess it.
_	The moral of the song is ""ghetto love is the law that we live by,"" describing the inevitable suffering of tragedy by those raised in crime-ridden areas.
_	It alleged that the Ministry had done so despite provisions in the law that would allow such an equivalent course.
_	It was not until 1999 that an exception was made to the law that provides that violations of the laws governing the Press - including those violations tainted with racism - should appear immediately before the Assize Court.
_	The rule was based on the law that the prophet Mohammed is ""the father of the orphans"", and on the fact that the Jews in Yemen were considered ""under protection"", and the ruler was obligated to care for them.
_	On 20 May 1982 the Basque Parliament unanimously approved the law that set up Euskal Irrati Telebista and on 23 November, the radio channel Euskadi Irratia started broadcasting.
_	However, NGOs criticize gaps in the law that allow the prosecution service to request such data directly from the service providers without court authorization.
_	Although it is the law that eventually forces More's execution, the play also makes several powerful statements in support of the rule of law.
_	Bag limits are provisions under the law that control how many animals of a given species or group of species can be killed, although there are often species for which bag limits do not apply.
_	The DMCA modified the law that the "Sony" decision was based upon in several ways, and new interpretations are still being handed down.
_	In the Chamber he voted for the law that introduced two years of military service and for the law on separation of church and state.
_	She joined with others to urge the state legislature to repeal the law that would lead to the destruction of wetlands in northeastern Indiana.
_	He was the lead House sponsor of the Kefauver Harris Amendment, an amendatory act to the federal Pure Food and Drug Act, the law that mandates that pharmaceutical companies disclose the side effects of medications approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale in the United States.
_	He also made the argument that the charges against her fall under parts of the law that were based on the now abolished 1974 constitution, and therefore are invalid.
_	Eight states have passed the law that prohibits post secondary institutions from demanding social media login information from any prospective or current students and privacy legislation has been introduced or is pending in at least 36 states as of July 2013.
_	The privacy law governing the use of bodycams by police in Italy is the law that protects personal data.
_	The most famous case is Philippe Pétain, who was awarded the distinction of Marshal of France for his generalship in World War I, and who was stripped of other positions and titles after his trial for high treason due to his involvement with collaborationist Vichy France: due to the principle of separation of powers, the court that judged him did not have the power to cancel the law that had made him a Marshal in the first place.
_	The underlying principle is that karma is the law that brings back the results of actions to the person performing them.
_	Finally, in 2010, after years of lobbying and activism by AMMAR Rosario, a different administration repealed the articles of the law that Cabrera had campaigned against.
_	Student-written notes, comments, and recent developments focus on new developments in the law that most directly affect trial practice and procedure.
_	In 2010 during political debate for the 8th March celebration she claimed that women gained the right to vote in Italy in 1960 (while they did in 1946) and that the law that rules intrahousehold relationship was reformed in 1970 (while it was in 1975)
_	""For our part we have the most absolute conviction that the relation that Christell has had with the tvshow Rojo Fama Contrafama adjusts completely to the law that recognizes the artistic activities of the young girl.
_	In 2001, Trotter sponsored and passed the law that created the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.
_	This is the law that has the greatest relevance to the issues involved.
_	The department noted: "we are bound to apply the law that was in effect at the time the allegations occurred rather than the law as it currently exists.
_	Not because I have no confidence in you, but it is the law that does not concern me.
_	"The court's decision in ordering the parents to send their daughters to a school they do not wish to is supposedly based upon the law that applies to recalcitrant citizens.
_	In 1908 the federal government established the law that authorized the construction of a railway line from Las Rosas to Bouquet.
_	The same apostle from whose epistle the above text is taken warns in the very next passage against the worldly endeavors that sought to penetrate also the congregation in order to establish the difference and distinction in the service of vanity, to emancipate it from the bond of perfection that knits its members together in equality before God, and to make it a slave in subjection to the law that rules the world and has presumably always ruled it: “to flatter people for the sake of advantage” (Jude 16)
_	Members of the co-op's board successfully lobbied the legislature to change the law that grants tax credits for the installation of solar panels in residences to include apartment buildings, which had been excluded.
_	Justice Holmes, less than two years into his service on the Supreme Court, wrote for the Court's majority that a state law "should not be disturbed by the courts under the 14th Amendment, unless they can see clearly that there is no fair reason for the law that would not require ... its extension to others whom it leaves untouched."
_	The judge referred to the same section of the law that Storsjö had cited in court.
_	In 1986, the law that established the Spanish National Health System also shifted financing toward progressive general taxes and away from payroll taxes.
_	Ukraine signed the European Charter on Regional or Minority Languages in 1996, but ratified it only in 2002 when the Parliament adopted the law that partly implemented the charter.
_	Saudi nationality law, officially called the Saudi Arabian Citizenship System, is the law that determines who is a Saudi citizen.
